673 | shrink (verb): to become smaller, like clothes washed too hot | loc: einlaufen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her sweater shrank. A lot!
  de TS: Ihr Pulli ist eingelaufen. Und wie!
  EN FS: Her scarf shrank. A lot!
  de FS: Ihr Schal ist eingelaufen. Und wie!
  EN TP: a shrunken red sweater
  de TP: ein eingelaufener roter Pulli
  EN FP: shrinking back in fear
  de FP: vor Angst zurückweichen
674 | sick (adjective): ill, not feeling well | loc: krank
  EN TS: She is sick and at home.
  de TS: Sie ist krank und zu Hause.
  EN FS: She is sick and at work.
  de FS: Sie ist krank und bei der Arbeit.
  EN TP: sick on the sofa
  de TP: krank auf dem Sofa
  EN FP: sick in a hospital bed
  de FP: krank im Krankenhausbett
675 | side (noun): the left or right part of something | loc: Seite
  EN TS: One side of the boat is done.
  de TS: Eine Seite des Boots ist fertig.
  EN FS: One side of the house is done.
  de FS: Eine Seite des Hauses ist fertig.
  EN TP: painting the boat's side
  de TP: die Seite des Boots streichen
  EN FP: the side of a lake
  de FP: die Seite eines Sees
676 | sightseeing (noun): visiting a city's famous places as a tourist | loc: Sightseeing
  EN TS: They're sightseeing in Venice.
  de TS: Sie machen Sightseeing in Venedig.
  EN FS: They're sightseeing in Paris.
  de FS: Sie machen Sightseeing in Paris.
  EN TP: sightseeing by gondola
  de TP: Sightseeing mit der Gondel
  EN FP: sightseeing by bus
  de FP: Sightseeing mit dem Bus
678 | silk (noun): smooth shiny cloth made from worm threads | loc: Seide
  EN TS: The silk refuses to stay.
  de TS: Die Seide will einfach nicht bleiben.
  EN FS: The cat refuses to stay.
  de FS: Die Katze will einfach nicht bleiben.
  EN TP: shiny green silk
  de TP: glänzende grüne Seide
  EN FP: a silk tie
  de FP: eine Seidenkrawatte
679 | silver (noun): a shiny grey precious metal | loc: Silber
  EN TS: The silver is shining again!
  de TS: Das Silber glänzt wieder!
  EN FS: The gold is shining again!
  de FS: Das Gold glänzt wieder!
  EN TP: polishing old silver
  de TP: altes Silber polieren
  EN FP: silver paint on a car
  de FP: Silberlack auf einem Auto
680 | singer (noun): a person whose job is to perform songs | loc: Sänger
  EN TS: The singer is having fun.
  de TS: Der Sänger hat seinen Spaß.
  EN FS: The singer is having lunch.
  de FS: Der Sänger macht Mittagspause.
  EN TP: a singer in a studio
  de TP: ein Sänger im Studio
  EN FP: a singer on stage
  de FP: ein Sänger auf der Bühne
681 | singing (noun): making music with your voice | loc: singen
  EN TS: Singing loudly in the car!
  de TS: Lautes Singen im Auto!
  EN FS: Singing loudly in the shower!
  de FS: Lautes Singen unter der Dusche!
  EN TP: singing along in a car
  de TP: im Auto mitsingen
  EN FP: singing on a stage
  de FP: auf einer Bühne singen
683 | sink (noun): a basin with a tap for washing things | loc: Spüle
  EN TS: The sink is a foam mountain!
  de TS: Die Spüle ist ein Schaumberg!
  EN FS: The bath is a foam mountain!
  de FS: Die Badewanne ist ein Schaumberg!
  EN TP: a sink full of foam
  de TP: eine Spüle voller Schaum
  EN FP: a sink full of toys
  de FP: eine Spüle voller Spielzeug
684 | sister (noun): a girl or woman with the same parents as you | loc: Schwester
  EN TS: Her sister is finally home!
  de TS: Ihre Schwester ist endlich zu Hause!
  EN FS: Her brother is finally home!
  de FS: Ihr Bruder ist endlich zu Hause!
  EN TP: hugging her sister
  de TP: ihre Schwester umarmen
  EN FP: fighting with her sister
  de FP: mit ihrer Schwester streiten
685 | size (noun): how big or small something is | loc: Größe
  EN TS: Finally, the right size.
  de TS: Endlich die richtige Größe.
  EN FS: Finally, the right shoes.
  de FS: Endlich die richtigen Schuhe.
  EN TP: the right hat size
  de TP: die richtige Hutgröße
  EN FP: the right shoe size
  de FP: die richtige Schuhgröße
687 | skateboard (noun): a short board with four wheels you ride on | loc: Skateboard
  EN TS: Skateboard at sunset? So cool.
  de TS: Skateboard im Sonnenuntergang? Voll cool.
  EN FS: Bicycle at sunset? So cool.
  de FS: Fahrrad im Sonnenuntergang? Voll cool.
  EN TP: riding a skateboard
  de TP: Skateboard fahren
  EN FP: a skateboard in a shop
  de FP: ein Skateboard im Laden
688 | skin (noun): the outer layer that covers your body | loc: Haut
  EN TS: She takes care of her skin.
  de TS: Sie pflegt ihre Haut.
  EN FS: She takes care of her dog.
  de FS: Sie pflegt ihren Hund.
  EN TP: putting cream on her skin
  de TP: Creme auf die Haut auftragen
  EN FP: washing her skin with soap
  de FP: die Haut mit Seife waschen
689 | skirt (noun): a piece of clothing that hangs down from the waist | loc: Rock
  EN TS: Great skirt, great spin!
  de TS: Toller Rock, tolle Drehung!
  EN FS: Great hat, great spin!
  de FS: Toller Hut, tolle Drehung!
  EN TP: a yellow pleated skirt
  de TP: ein gelber Faltenrock
  EN FP: a long black skirt
  de FP: ein langer schwarzer Rock
690 | sky (noun): the space above the earth where you see clouds | loc: Himmel
  EN TS: The sky is so big.
  de TS: Der Himmel ist so riesig.
  EN FS: The sea is so big.
  de FS: Das Meer ist so riesig.
  EN TP: looking up at the sky
  de TP: zum Himmel hochschauen
  EN FP: a sky full of stars
  de FP: ein Himmel voller Sterne
691 | guard (verb): to watch over something so nobody takes it | loc: bewachen
  EN TS: He is guarding his car. Badly.
  de TS: Er bewacht sein Auto. Schlecht.
  EN FS: He is washing his car. Badly.
  de FS: Er wäscht sein Auto. Schlecht.
  EN TP: guarding a parked car
  de TP: ein geparktes Auto bewachen
  EN FP: guarding a bank
  de FP: eine Bank bewachen
692 | sleeping (noun): the state of resting with your eyes closed | loc: schlafen
  EN TS: Sleeping? He is a pro.
  de TS: Schlafen? Da ist er Profi.
  EN FS: Reading? He is a pro.
  de FS: Lesen? Da ist er Profi.
  EN TP: sleeping under a blanket
  de TP: unter einer Decke schlafen
  EN FP: sleeping in a tent
  de FP: in einem Zelt schlafen
693 | sleepy (adjective): tired and ready to fall asleep | loc: schläfrig
  EN TS: Just five more minutes. So sleepy.
  de TS: Nur noch fünf Minuten. So schläfrig.
  EN FS: Just five more minutes. So awake.
  de FS: Nur noch fünf Minuten. So hellwach.
  EN TP: a sleepy night ride
  de TP: eine schläfrige Nachtfahrt
  EN FP: a sleepy morning class
  de FP: eine schläfrige Morgenvorlesung
694 | slice (verb): to cut something into thin flat pieces | loc: schneiden
  EN TS: He is slicing a tomato.
  de TS: Er schneidet eine Tomate.
  EN FS: He is slicing a cucumber.
  de FS: Er schneidet eine Gurke.
  EN TP: to slice a tomato thin
  de TP: eine Tomate dünn schneiden
  EN FP: to slice a cake
  de FP: einen Kuchen schneiden
695 | smiling (noun): the act of turning up the corners of your mouth | loc: lächeln
  EN TS: Soon everyone is smiling.
  de TS: Bald lächeln alle.
  EN FS: Soon everyone is crying.
  de FS: Bald weinen alle.
  EN TP: smiling on a ferry
  de TP: Lächeln auf der Fähre
  EN FP: smiling at the camera
  de FP: Lächeln in die Kamera
696 | smoke (noun): the grey cloud that rises from something burning | loc: Rauch
  EN TS: He is lost in the smoke!
  de TS: Er verschwindet im Rauch!
  EN FS: He is lost in the snow!
  de FS: Er verschwindet im Schnee!
  EN TP: a cloud of grey smoke
  de TP: eine graue Rauchwolke
  EN FP: smoke from a chimney
  de FP: Rauch aus einem Schornstein
697 | smoking (noun): breathing in from a lit cigarette | loc: rauchen
  EN TS: The smoking area is busy.
  de TS: Im Raucherbereich rauchen gerade viele.
  EN FS: The smoking area is empty.
  de FS: Im Raucherbereich raucht gerade keiner.
  EN TP: smoking outside a bar
  de TP: vor einer Bar rauchen
  EN FP: a no smoking sign
  de FP: ein Rauchverbotsschild
698 | smoothie (noun): a thick cold drink of blended fruit | loc: Smoothie
  EN TS: The smoothie is so purple.
  de TS: Der Smoothie ist sooo lila.
  EN FS: The smoothie is so green.
  de FS: Der Smoothie ist sooo grün.
  EN TP: a thick berry smoothie
  de TP: ein dicker Beeren-Smoothie
  EN FP: a green smoothie
  de FP: ein grüner Smoothie
699 | smuggle (verb): to take something past a guard in secret | loc: schmuggeln
  EN TS: He smuggled cheese past the guard!
  de TS: Er hat Käse an der Wache vorbeigeschmuggelt!
  EN FS: He smuggled wine past the guard!
  de FS: Er hat Wein an der Wache vorbeigeschmuggelt!
  EN TP: smuggling cheese in hay
  de TP: Käse im Heu schmuggeln
  EN FP: smuggling cheese on a boat
  de FP: Käse auf einem Boot schmuggeln
700 | snail (noun): a slow small animal that carries its shell | loc: Schnecke
  EN TS: The snail is in no hurry.
  de TS: Die Schnecke hat's nicht eilig.
  EN FS: The frog is in no hurry.
  de FS: Der Frosch hat's nicht eilig.
  EN TP: a snail on a leaf
  de TP: eine Schnecke auf einem Blatt
  EN FP: a snail on a plate
  de FP: eine Schnecke auf einem Teller
701 | snake (noun): a long animal with no legs that slides along | loc: Schlange
  EN TS: The snake is on a black rock.
  de TS: Die Schlange liegt auf einem schwarzen Stein.
  EN FS: The snake is on a white rock.
  de FS: Die Schlange liegt auf einem weißen Stein.
  EN TP: a snake in the sand
  de TP: eine Schlange im Sand
  EN FP: a snake in the grass
  de FP: eine Schlange im Gras
702 | sneakers (noun): soft sports shoes with rubber soles | loc: Sneaker
  EN TS: Sneakers on, stairs next.
  de TS: Sneaker an, jetzt die Treppe.
  EN FS: Sandals on, stairs next.
  de FS: Sandalen an, jetzt die Treppe.
  EN TP: lacing teal sneakers
  de TP: türkise Sneaker schnüren
  EN FP: cleaning teal sneakers
  de FP: türkise Sneaker putzen
704 | sneeze (verb): to blow air out of your nose suddenly | loc: niesen
  EN TS: He sneezed his hat off!
  de TS: Er hat sich den Hut vom Kopf geniest!
  EN FS: He sneezed his shoe off!
  de FS: Er hat sich den Schuh vom Fuß geniest!
  EN TP: sneezing at dandelions
  de TP: wegen Pusteblumen niesen
  EN FP: sneezing at a cat
  de FP: wegen einer Katze niesen
705 | sneezing (noun): blowing air out of your nose suddenly | loc: niesen
  EN TS: The sneezing never stops.
  de TS: Das Niesen hört nie auf.
  EN FS: The singing never stops.
  de FS: Das Singen hört nie auf.
  EN TP: sneezing into her elbow
  de TP: in die Armbeuge niesen
  EN FP: sneezing into a tissue
  de FP: in ein Taschentuch niesen
706 | snow (noun): soft white frozen flakes that fall in winter | loc: Schnee
  EN TS: Snow on the tongue? Yummy!
  de TS: Schnee auf der Zunge? Lecker!
  EN FS: Rain on the tongue? Yummy!
  de FS: Regen auf der Zunge? Lecker!
  EN TP: catching snow on the tongue
  de TP: Schnee mit der Zunge fangen
  EN FP: clearing snow from a car
  de FP: Schnee vom Auto räumen
707 | snowboard (noun): a wide board for sliding down slopes in winter | loc: Snowboard
  EN TS: Cool orange snowboard, dude.
  de TS: Cooles oranges Snowboard, Alter.
  EN FS: Cool blue snowboard, dude.
  de FS: Cooles blaues Snowboard, Alter.
  EN TP: strapping on a snowboard
  de TP: ein Snowboard anschnallen
  EN FP: a snowboard in a shop
  de FP: ein Snowboard im Laden
708 | soap (noun): a bar or liquid you use with water to wash | loc: Seife
  EN TS: Muddy hands? Soap time!
  de TS: Matschige Hände? Zeit für Seife!
  EN FS: Muddy feet? Soap time!
  de FS: Matschige Füße? Zeit für Seife!
  EN TP: a bar of soap
  de TP: ein Stück Seife
  EN FP: a bottle of soap
  de FP: eine Flasche Seife
710 | suds (noun): the white bubbles that soap makes in water | loc: Schaum
  EN TS: A cloud of suds in her hands.
  de TS: Eine Schaumwolke in ihren Händen.
  EN FS: A cloud of suds on her head.
  de FS: Eine Schaumwolke auf ihrem Kopf.
  EN TP: a huge cloud of suds
  de TP: eine riesige Schaumwolke
  EN FP: suds in a washing machine
  de FP: Schaum in der Waschmaschine
711 | socket (noun): the outlet in a wall where you plug things in | loc: Steckdose
  EN TS: Phone at 1%. Socket found!
  de TS: Handy auf 1 %. Steckdose gefunden!
  EN FS: Phone at 50%. Socket found!
  de FS: Handy auf 50 %. Steckdose gefunden!
  EN TP: a hidden wall socket
  de TP: eine versteckte Steckdose
  EN FP: a light bulb socket
  de FP: eine Glühbirnenfassung
712 | soda (noun): a sweet fizzy drink | loc: Limo
  EN TS: He is scared of his soda.
  de TS: Er hat Angst vor seiner Limo.
  EN FS: He is scared of his sandwich.
  de FS: Er hat Angst vor seinem Sandwich.
  EN TP: a can of orange soda
  de TP: eine Dose Orangenlimo
  EN FP: a glass of cola soda
  de FP: ein Glas Cola
713 | soil (noun): the dark earth that plants grow in | loc: Erde
  EN TS: Oh, hello! A worm in the soil!
  de TS: Oh, hallo! Ein Wurm in der Erde!
  EN FS: Oh, hello! A coin in the soil!
  de FS: Oh, hallo! Eine Münze in der Erde!
  EN TP: planting in dark soil
  de TP: in dunkle Erde pflanzen
  EN FP: soil on the carpet
  de FP: Erde auf dem Teppich
714 | soldier (noun): a person who fights in an army | loc: Soldat
  EN TS: The soldier is home again!
  de TS: Der Soldat ist wieder zu Hause!
  EN FS: The soldier is at sea again!
  de FS: Der Soldat ist wieder auf See!
  EN TP: a soldier coming home
  de TP: ein Soldat kommt heim
  EN FP: a soldier leaving home
  de FP: ein Soldat zieht los
715 | someone (noun): a person, but you do not know or say who | loc: jemand
  EN TS: Someone left her a coffee.
  de TS: Jemand hat ihr einen Kaffee hingestellt.
  EN FS: Someone left her a pizza.
  de FS: Jemand hat ihr eine Pizza hingestellt.
  EN TP: a note from someone
  de TP: eine Nachricht von jemandem
  EN FP: someone's birthday card
  de FP: jemandes Geburtstagskarte
716 | soup spoon (noun): a big round spoon for eating hot liquid food | loc: Suppenlöffel
  EN TS: He eats with a soup spoon.
  de TS: Er isst mit einem Suppenlöffel.
  EN FS: He eats with chopsticks.
  de FS: Er isst mit Stäbchen.
  EN TP: eating with a soup spoon
  de TP: mit einem Suppenlöffel essen
  EN FP: stirring with a soup spoon
  de FP: mit einem Suppenlöffel umrühren
717 | soup (noun): a hot liquid food made from vegetables or meat | loc: Suppe
  EN TS: The soup is burning hot!
  de TS: Die Suppe ist brennend heiß!
  EN FS: The soup is ice cold!
  de FS: Die Suppe ist eiskalt!
  EN TP: hot tomato soup
  de TP: heiße Tomatensuppe
  EN FP: cold tomato soup
  de FP: kalte Tomatensuppe
718 | south (noun): the direction toward the bottom of a map | loc: Süden
  EN TS: The geese are flying south.
  de TS: Die Gänse fliegen in den Süden.
  EN FS: The geese are walking south.
  de FS: Die Gänse laufen in den Süden.
  EN TP: following the birds south
  de TP: den Vögeln in den Süden folgen
  EN FP: driving south
  de FP: in den Süden fahren
719 | space (noun): the empty area beyond the sky, with stars | loc: Weltraum
  EN TS: Wow, space is so empty!
  de TS: Wow, der Weltraum ist so leer!
  EN FS: Wow, the sea is so empty!
  de FS: Wow, das Meer ist so leer!
  EN TP: stars in space
  de TP: Sterne im Weltraum
  EN FP: a parking space
  de FP: ein Parkplatz
720 | spice (noun): a strong-tasting powder used to flavour food | loc: Gewürz
  EN TS: That spice is really strong.
  de TS: Das Gewürz ist echt scharf.
  EN FS: That spice is really green.
  de FS: Das Gewürz ist echt grün.
  EN TP: red spice in a cone
  de TP: ein Kegel aus rotem Gewürz
  EN FP: a jar of dried spice
  de FP: ein Glas getrocknetes Gewürz
721 | spilling (noun): the act of letting liquid fall out by accident | loc: Verschütten
  EN TS: She caused the spilling!
  de TS: Sie ist schuld am Verschütten!
  EN FS: The boy caused the spilling!
  de FS: Der Junge ist schuld am Verschütten!
  EN TP: spilling a glass of water
  de TP: ein Glas Wasser verschütten
  EN FP: spilling a cup of coffee
  de FP: eine Tasse Kaffee verschütten
723 | spine (noun): the column of bones down the middle of the back | loc: Wirbelsäule
  EN TS: The doctor is showing him the spine, bone by bone.
  de TS: Der Arzt zeigt ihm die Wirbelsäule, Knochen für Knochen.
  EN FS: The doctor is showing him the skull, bone by bone.
  de FS: Der Arzt zeigt ihm den Schädel, Knochen für Knochen.
  EN TP: bones of the spine
  de TP: Knochen der Wirbelsäule
  EN FP: the spine of a book
  de FP: der Rücken eines Buchs
724 | splash (noun): water flying up when something hits it | loc: Spritzer
  EN TS: Each splash gets bigger!
  de TS: Jeder Spritzer wird größer!
  EN FS: Each splash gets smaller!
  de FS: Jeder Spritzer wird kleiner!
  EN TP: a huge splash
  de TP: ein riesiger Spritzer
  EN FP: a splash of milk
  de FP: ein Spritzer Milch
726 | spring (noun): the season after winter when plants grow | loc: Frühling
  EN TS: Spring is here, jacket off.
  de TS: Der Frühling ist da, Jacke aus.
  EN FS: Winter is here, jacket off.
  de FS: Der Winter ist da, Jacke aus.
  EN TP: spring under cherry trees
  de TP: Frühling unter Kirschbäumen
  EN FP: spring rain in the city
  de FP: Frühlingsregen in der Stadt
727 | sprint (verb): to run at full speed over a short distance | loc: sprinten
  EN TS: She sprinted to the finish!
  de TS: Sie ist ins Ziel gesprintet!
  EN FS: She walked to the finish!
  de FS: Sie ist ins Ziel spaziert!
  EN TP: sprinting to the finish line
  de TP: zur Ziellinie sprinten
  EN FP: sprinting for the bus
  de FP: zum Bus sprinten
729 | squirrel (noun): a small tree animal with a big bushy tail | loc: Eichhörnchen
  EN TS: The squirrel is planning for winter.
  de TS: Das Eichhörnchen plant schon für den Winter.
  EN FS: The rabbit is planning for winter.
  de FS: Das Kaninchen plant schon für den Winter.
  EN TP: a squirrel with an acorn
  de TP: ein Eichhörnchen mit einer Eichel
  EN FP: a squirrel with a pizza
  de FP: ein Eichhörnchen mit einer Pizza
730 | staff (noun): all the people who work for a place | loc: Personal
  EN TS: The staff are posing together.
  de TS: Das Personal posiert zusammen.
  EN FS: The staff are eating together.
  de FS: Das Personal isst zusammen.
  EN TP: restaurant staff at work
  de TP: Restaurantpersonal bei der Arbeit
  EN FP: staff on a train
  de FP: Personal in einem Zug
731 | stamp (noun): a small sticker you put on a letter to post it | loc: Briefmarke
  EN TS: He is putting a stamp on it.
  de TS: Er klebt eine Briefmarke drauf.
  EN FS: He is putting a coin on it.
  de FS: Er legt eine Münze drauf.
  EN TP: a stamp on an envelope
  de TP: eine Briefmarke auf einem Umschlag
  EN FP: a stamp in a passport
  de FP: ein Stempel im Reisepass
733 | state (noun): a country with its own government | loc: Staat
  EN TS: Two states signed a treaty.
  de TS: Zwei Staaten haben einen Vertrag unterzeichnet.
  EN FS: Three states signed a treaty.
  de FS: Drei Staaten haben einen Vertrag unterzeichnet.
  EN TP: two states signing a treaty
  de TP: zwei Staaten unterzeichnen einen Vertrag
  EN FP: a state of chaos
  de FP: ein chaotischer Zustand
734 | steak (noun): a thick slice of beef that you fry or grill | loc: Steak
  EN TS: The dog wants that steak.
  de TS: Der Hund will das Steak.
  EN FS: The cat wants that steak.
  de FS: Die Katze will das Steak.
  EN TP: a steak with pink inside
  de TP: ein Steak, innen rosa
  EN FP: a steak in the freezer
  de FP: ein Steak im Gefrierfach
735 | steam (noun): the hot white cloud boiling water turns into | loc: Dampf
  EN TS: Steam fogged up his glasses!
  de TS: Seine Brille ist vom Dampf beschlagen!
  EN FS: Rain fogged up his glasses!
  de FS: Seine Brille ist vom Regen beschlagen!
  EN TP: a cloud of steam
  de TP: eine Dampfwolke
  EN FP: a cloud of smoke
  de FP: eine Rauchwolke
736 | stepbrother (noun): the son of your parent's new husband or wife | loc: Stiefbruder
  EN TS: Hi, new stepbrother!
  de TS: Hi, neuer Stiefbruder!
  EN FS: Hi, new stepsister!
  de FS: Hi, neue Stiefschwester!
  EN TP: meeting a new stepbrother
  de TP: einen neuen Stiefbruder kennenlernen
  EN FP: fighting with a stepbrother
  de FP: mit dem Stiefbruder streiten
737 | stepfather (noun): the man married to your mother, not your dad | loc: Stiefvater
  EN TS: Stepfather of the year fixed the bike.
  de TS: Der Stiefvater des Jahres hat das Fahrrad repariert.
  EN FS: Stepfather of the year fixed the car.
  de FS: Der Stiefvater des Jahres hat das Auto repariert.
  EN TP: a stepfather fixing a bike
  de TP: ein Stiefvater repariert ein Fahrrad
  EN FP: a stepfather at a wedding
  de FP: ein Stiefvater auf einer Hochzeit
738 | sticky note (noun): a small square of paper you stick up as a reminder | loc: Haftnotiz
  EN TS: He drew a heart on a sticky note.
  de TS: Er hat ein Herz auf eine Haftnotiz gemalt.
  EN FS: He drew a star on a sticky note.
  de FS: Er hat einen Stern auf eine Haftnotiz gemalt.
  EN TP: a heart sticky note
  de TP: eine Haftnotiz mit Herz
  EN FP: sticky notes on a screen
  de FP: Haftnotizen am Bildschirm
739 | stop (verb): to end moving and stay still | loc: anhalten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He stopped for pizza. Rules are rules.
  de TS: Er hat für Pizza angehalten. Regeln sind Regeln.
  EN FS: He stopped for sushi. Rules are rules.
  de FS: Er hat für Sushi angehalten. Regeln sind Regeln.
  EN TP: to stop for pizza
  de TP: für Pizza anhalten
  EN FP: to stop for petrol
  de FP: zum Tanken anhalten
740 | stopwatch (noun): a watch you start and stop to time something | loc: Stoppuhr
  EN TS: The stopwatch must be broken!
  de TS: Die Stoppuhr muss kaputt sein!
  EN FS: The phone must be broken!
  de FS: Das Handy muss kaputt sein!
  EN TP: clicking a stopwatch
  de TP: eine Stoppuhr drücken
  EN FP: clicking a phone camera
  de FP: auf die Handykamera drücken
741 | storm (noun): very bad weather with strong wind and rain | loc: Sturm
  EN TS: Big storm outside, tea inside.
  de TS: Draußen Sturm, drinnen Tee.
  EN FS: Big sun outside, tea inside.
  de FS: Draußen Sonne, drinnen Tee.
  EN TP: watching a storm with tea
  de TP: mit Tee dem Sturm zusehen
  EN FP: walking in a storm
  de FP: im Sturm spazieren gehen
742 | stove (noun): a kitchen machine with burners for cooking | loc: Herd
  EN TS: All four stove burners are on.
  de TS: Alle vier Herdplatten sind an.
  EN FS: Only one stove burner is on.
  de FS: Nur eine Herdplatte ist an.
  EN TP: four burners on a stove
  de TP: vier Flammen auf dem Herd
  EN FP: a small camping stove
  de FP: ein kleiner Campingkocher
743 | straight (adjective): not bent or curved, in a direct line | loc: gerade
  EN TS: The road is totally straight.
  de TS: Die Straße ist komplett gerade.
  EN FS: The road is totally curvy.
  de FS: Die Straße ist komplett kurvig.
  EN TP: a straight row of bricks
  de TP: eine gerade Reihe Ziegel
  EN FP: a straight answer
  de FP: eine direkte Antwort
744 | stranger (noun): a person you do not know at all | loc: Fremder
  EN TS: She met a stranger with an umbrella.
  de TS: Sie hat einen Fremden mit Regenschirm getroffen.
  EN FS: She met a stranger with a big dog.
  de FS: Sie hat einen Fremden mit großem Hund getroffen.
  EN TP: a stranger with an umbrella
  de TP: ein Fremder mit Regenschirm
  EN FP: a stranger with a bike
  de FP: ein Fremder mit Fahrrad
746 | stream (noun): a small narrow river running through land | loc: Bach
  EN TS: They are jumping the stream!
  de TS: Sie springen über den Bach!
  EN FS: They are jumping the fence!
  de FS: Sie springen über den Zaun!
  EN TP: jumping over a stream
  de TP: über einen Bach springen
  EN FP: swimming in a stream
  de FP: in einem Bach schwimmen
747 | stress (noun): mental pressure from having too much to do | loc: Stress
  EN TS: It's just a little stress.
  de TS: Ist doch nur ein bisschen Stress.
  EN FS: It's just a little rain.
  de FS: Ist doch nur ein bisschen Regen.
  EN TP: stress at the office
  de TP: Stress im Büro
  EN FP: stress at the gym
  de FP: Stress im Fitnessstudio
749 | stretch (verb): to pull your body long to loosen your muscles | loc: dehnen
  EN TS: They are stretching together.
  de TS: Sie dehnen sich zusammen.
  EN FS: They are dancing together.
  de FS: Sie tanzen zusammen.
  EN TP: to stretch before running
  de TP: sich vor dem Laufen dehnen
  EN FP: to stretch a rubber band
  de FP: ein Gummiband dehnen
750 | string (noun): a thin cord for tying things | loc: Schnur
  EN TS: The string holds the box securely.
  de TS: Die Schnur hält die Kiste sicher zusammen.
  EN FS: The string holds the bag securely.
  de FS: Die Schnur hält die Tasche sicher zusammen.
  EN TP: a box tied with string
  de TP: eine mit Schnur verschnürte Kiste
  EN FP: a guitar string
  de FP: eine Gitarrensaite
751 | style (noun): your own way of dressing and looking | loc: Stil
  EN TS: Matching? Not her style.
  de TS: Alles passend? Nicht ihr Stil.
  EN FS: Purple boots? Not her style.
  de FS: Lila Stiefel? Nicht ihr Stil.
  EN TP: her own bold style
  de TP: ihr eigener, mutiger Stil
  EN FP: a style of music
  de FP: ein Musikstil
752 | sugar (noun): sweet white grains you add to food and drinks | loc: Zucker
  EN TS: Sugar saved her coffee!
  de TS: Zucker hat ihren Kaffee gerettet!
  EN FS: Milk saved her coffee!
  de FS: Milch hat ihren Kaffee gerettet!
  EN TP: sugar in black coffee
  de TP: Zucker in schwarzem Kaffee
  EN FP: sugar on a cake
  de FP: Zucker auf einem Kuchen
753 | suit (noun): a jacket and trousers that match | loc: Anzug
  EN TS: That blue suit fits him well.
  de TS: Der blaue Anzug steht ihm richtig gut.
  EN FS: That grey suit fits him well.
  de FS: Der graue Anzug steht ihm richtig gut.
  EN TP: trying on a blue suit
  de TP: einen blauen Anzug anprobieren
  EN FP: washing a blue suit
  de FP: einen blauen Anzug waschen
754 | support (verb): to hold someone up and help them succeed | loc: unterstützen
  EN TS: Her friend is supporting her.
  de TS: Ihre Freundin unterstützt sie.
  EN FS: Her friend is ignoring her.
  de FS: Ihre Freundin ignoriert sie.
  EN TP: supporting her friend
  de TP: die Freundin unterstützen
  EN FP: supporting a football team
  de FP: eine Fußballmannschaft unterstützen
755 | surface (noun): the flat top layer of something you can touch | loc: Oberfläche
  EN TS: Every surface here is smooth.
  de TS: Jede Oberfläche hier ist glatt.
  EN FS: Every surface here is rough.
  de FS: Jede Oberfläche hier ist rau.
  EN TP: a smooth shiny surface
  de TP: eine glatte, glänzende Oberfläche
  EN FP: a surface full of scratches
  de FP: eine zerkratzte Oberfläche
756 | surfboard (noun): the long board you stand on to ride waves | loc: Surfbrett
  EN TS: Nice ride on that surfboard.
  de TS: Nicht schlecht auf dem Surfbrett.
  EN FS: Nice ride on that jet ski.
  de FS: Nicht schlecht auf dem Jetski.
  EN TP: waxing a white surfboard
  de TP: ein weißes Surfbrett wachsen
  EN FP: a surfboard in a shop
  de FP: ein Surfbrett im Laden
757 | surprise (noun): something nice you did not expect | loc: Überraschung
  EN TS: A puppy in a box! What a surprise!
  de TS: Ein Welpe im Karton! Was für eine Überraschung!
  EN FS: A kitten in a box! What a surprise!
  de FS: Ein Kätzchen im Karton! Was für eine Überraschung!
  EN TP: a surprise in a box
  de TP: eine Überraschung im Karton
  EN FP: a surprise party at home
  de FP: eine Überraschungsparty zu Hause
758 | swan (noun): a large white water bird with a long neck | loc: Schwan
  EN TS: The swan is cleaning itself.
  de TS: Der Schwan putzt sich.
  EN FS: The swan is eating a fish.
  de FS: Der Schwan frisst einen Fisch.
  EN TP: a swan on a lake
  de TP: ein Schwan auf einem See
  EN FP: a swan on the grass
  de FP: ein Schwan auf der Wiese
759 | sweater (noun): a warm knitted top with long sleeves | loc: Pullover
  EN TS: Rain outside, sweater inside.
  de TS: Draußen Regen, drinnen Pullover.
  EN FS: Sun outside, sweater inside.
  de FS: Draußen Sonne, drinnen Pullover.
  EN TP: pulling on a cozy sweater
  de TP: einen kuscheligen Pullover anziehen
  EN FP: knitting a cozy sweater
  de FP: einen kuscheligen Pullover stricken
760 | swell (verb): to grow bigger and puffy after an injury | loc: anschwellen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Oh no! His ankle is swelling!
  de TS: Oh nein! Sein Knöchel schwillt an!
  EN FS: Oh no! His wrist is swelling!
  de FS: Oh nein! Sein Handgelenk schwillt an!
  EN TP: an ankle swelling up
  de TP: ein anschwellender Knöchel
  EN FP: a wrist swelling up
  de FP: ein anschwellendes Handgelenk
761 | swelling (noun): a puffed-up part of the body after injury | loc: Schwellung
  EN TS: Her foot has a big swelling.
  de TS: Ihr Fuß hat eine große Schwellung.
  EN FS: Her hand has a big swelling.
  de FS: Ihre Hand hat eine große Schwellung.
  EN TP: a swelling on the ankle
  de TP: eine Schwellung am Knöchel
  EN FP: a swelling on the knee
  de FP: eine Schwellung am Knie
762 | t-shirt (noun): a simple top with short sleeves and no collar | loc: T-Shirt
  EN TS: No, no, maybe... that T-shirt!
  de TS: Nein, nein, vielleicht ... das T-Shirt!
  EN FS: No, no, maybe... that jacket!
  de FS: Nein, nein, vielleicht ... die Jacke!
  EN TP: pulling on a teal T-shirt
  de TP: ein türkises T-Shirt anziehen
  EN FP: folding a teal T-shirt
  de FP: ein türkises T-Shirt falten
763 | tablecloth (noun): a cloth spread over a table to cover it | loc: Tischdecke
  EN TS: The tablecloth is flying up.
  de TS: Die Tischdecke fliegt hoch.
  EN FS: The curtain is flying up.
  de FS: Der Vorhang fliegt hoch.
  EN TP: throwing a tablecloth up
  de TP: eine Tischdecke hochwerfen
  EN FP: a tablecloth with wine stains
  de FP: eine Tischdecke mit Weinflecken
764 | tablet (noun): a flat computer with a touch screen | loc: Tablet
  EN TS: He is drawing on a tablet.
  de TS: Er zeichnet auf einem Tablet.
  EN FS: He is drawing on a napkin.
  de FS: Er zeichnet auf einer Serviette.
  EN TP: drawing on a tablet
  de TP: auf einem Tablet zeichnen
  EN FP: a tablet of medicine
  de FP: eine Tablette
766 | tattoo (noun): a permanent picture inked into the skin | loc: Tattoo
  EN TS: This tattoo is forever!
  de TS: Dieses Tattoo ist für immer!
  EN FS: This sticker is forever!
  de FS: Dieser Sticker ist für immer!
  EN TP: a fresh bird tattoo
  de TP: ein frisches Vogel-Tattoo
  EN FP: a tattoo on a leg
  de FP: ein Tattoo am Bein
767 | tea (noun): a hot drink made by soaking dried leaves | loc: Tee
  EN TS: The tea leaves are dancing!
  de TS: Die Teeblätter tanzen!
  EN FS: The tea bags are dancing!
  de FS: Die Teebeutel tanzen!
  EN TP: pouring mint tea
  de TP: Minztee einschenken
  EN FP: tea with milk
  de FP: Tee mit Milch
768 | team (noun): a group of people who work or play together | loc: Team
  EN TS: The team is rowing in unison.
  de TS: Das Team rudert im Gleichtakt.
  EN FS: The team is running in unison.
  de FS: Das Team läuft im Gleichtakt.
  EN TP: a rowing team at sunrise
  de TP: ein Ruderteam bei Sonnenaufgang
  EN FP: a team in an office
  de FP: ein Team im Büro
769 | teaspoon (noun): a small spoon for stirring drinks | loc: Teelöffel
  EN TS: The teaspoons are tiny.
  de TS: Die Teelöffel sind winzig.
  EN FS: The teaspoons are huge.
  de FS: Die Teelöffel sind riesig.
  EN TP: stirring with a teaspoon
  de TP: mit einem Teelöffel umrühren
  EN FP: a teaspoon of sugar
  de FP: ein Teelöffel Zucker
770 | tennis (noun): a game of hitting a ball over a net with rackets | loc: Tennis
  EN TS: She dived for a tennis ball!
  de TS: Sie ist nach dem Tennisball gehechtet!
  EN FS: She dived for a golf ball!
  de FS: Sie ist nach dem Golfball gehechtet!
  EN TP: diving in a tennis match
  de TP: ein Hechtsprung beim Tennis
  EN FP: tennis on a grass court
  de FP: Tennis auf Rasen
771 | terminal (noun): the airport building where flights start | loc: Terminal
  EN TS: The terminal is huge.
  de TS: Das Terminal ist riesig.
  EN FS: The terminal is tiny.
  de FS: Das Terminal ist winzig.
  EN TP: a huge glass terminal
  de TP: ein riesiges Terminal aus Glas
  EN FP: a small bus terminal
  de FP: ein kleiner Busbahnhof
772 | therapy (noun): treatment by talking to a professional | loc: Therapie
  EN TS: Therapy is helping the client.
  de TS: Die Therapie hilft dem Klienten.
  EN FS: Yoga is helping the client.
  de FS: Yoga hilft dem Klienten.
  EN TP: a therapy session
  de TP: eine Therapiesitzung
  EN FP: a yoga session
  de FP: eine Yogastunde
773 | thermometer (noun): an instrument that measures temperature | loc: Thermometer
  EN TS: His thermometer went crazy!
  de TS: Sein Thermometer spielt verrückt!
  EN FS: His watch went crazy!
  de FS: Seine Uhr spielt verrückt!
  EN TP: a thermometer in the mouth
  de TP: ein Thermometer im Mund
  EN FP: a thermometer on the wall
  de FP: ein Thermometer an der Wand
775 | thinking (noun): using your mind to work something out | loc: Nachdenken
  EN TS: So much thinking for one move!
  de TS: So viel Nachdenken für einen Zug!
  EN FS: So much thinking for one goal!
  de FS: So viel Nachdenken für ein Tor!
  EN TP: deep thinking over chess
  de TP: tiefes Nachdenken beim Schach
  EN FP: deep thinking over cards
  de FP: tiefes Nachdenken beim Kartenspiel
776 | thirst (noun): the strong feeling of needing to drink | loc: Durst
  EN TS: One drop for a big thirst.
  de TS: Ein Tropfen für einen großen Durst.
  EN FS: One biscuit for a big thirst.
  de FS: Ein Keks für einen großen Durst.
  EN TP: a terrible thirst
  de TP: ein schrecklicher Durst
  EN FP: a thirst for adventure
  de FP: Abenteuerdurst
777 | thirsty (adjective): needing or wanting something to drink | loc: durstig
  EN TS: He is super thirsty!
  de TS: Er ist mega durstig!
  EN FS: He is super hungry!
  de FS: Er ist mega hungrig!
  EN TP: thirsty at the market
  de TP: durstig auf dem Markt
  EN FP: thirsty after a run
  de FP: durstig nach dem Laufen
778 | thread (noun): a long thin strand of cotton for sewing | loc: Faden
  EN TS: A thread that is miles long!
  de TS: Ein Faden, kilometerlang!
  EN FS: A rope that is miles long!
  de FS: Ein Seil, kilometerlang!
  EN TP: a long red thread
  de TP: ein langer roter Faden
  EN FP: a chat thread
  de FP: ein Chatverlauf
779 | otter (noun): a playful furry animal that lives by water | loc: Otter
  EN TS: This otter wants a nap.
  de TS: Dieser Otter will ein Nickerchen.
  EN FS: This cat wants a nap.
  de FS: Diese Katze will ein Nickerchen.
  EN TP: a sleepy otter
  de TP: ein schläfriger Otter
  EN FP: an otter in a river
  de FP: ein Otter im Fluss
780 | stand (verb): to be upright on your feet | loc: stehen
  EN TS: The cats are standing like soldiers!
  de TS: Die Katzen stehen stramm wie Soldaten!
  EN FS: The dogs are standing like soldiers!
  de FS: Die Hunde stehen stramm wie Soldaten!
  EN TP: cats standing on a bed
  de TP: Katzen stehen auf einem Bett
  EN FP: cats standing on a table
  de FP: Katzen stehen auf einem Tisch
781 | thunder (noun): the loud noise after lightning in a storm | loc: Donner
  EN TS: One, two, three... thunder!
  de TS: Eins, zwei, drei ... Donner!
  EN FS: One, two, three... rainbow!
  de FS: Eins, zwei, drei ... Regenbogen!
  EN TP: waiting for the thunder
  de TP: auf den Donner warten
  EN FP: thunder in a football stadium
  de FP: Donner im Fußballstadion
782 | tie (noun): a long strip of cloth worn around the collar | loc: Krawatte
  EN TS: Second try, perfect tie.
  de TS: Zweiter Versuch, perfekte Krawatte.
  EN FS: Second try, perfect cake.
  de FS: Zweiter Versuch, perfekter Kuchen.
  EN TP: knotting a dark red tie
  de TP: eine dunkelrote Krawatte binden
  EN FP: buying a dark red tie
  de FP: eine dunkelrote Krawatte kaufen
783 | tiger (noun): a big wild cat with orange fur and black stripes | loc: Tiger
  EN TS: Wet tiger, bad mood!
  de TS: Nasser Tiger, miese Laune!
  EN FS: Wet lion, bad mood!
  de FS: Nasser Löwe, miese Laune!
  EN TP: a tiger in a river
  de TP: ein Tiger im Fluss
  EN FP: a tiger in a tree
  de FP: ein Tiger auf einem Baum
784 | tilt (verb): to lean something into a slanted position | loc: neigen
  EN TS: She's tilting the umbrella.
  de TS: Sie neigt den Regenschirm.
  EN FS: She's closing the umbrella.
  de FS: Sie schließt den Regenschirm.
  EN TP: tilting the umbrella
  de TP: den Regenschirm neigen
  EN FP: tilting her head
  de FP: den Kopf neigen
785 | timetable (noun): a list of times when trains or buses leave | loc: Fahrplan
  EN TS: He is checking the timetable.
  de TS: Er studiert den Fahrplan.
  EN FS: He is checking the newspaper.
  de FS: Er studiert die Zeitung.
  EN TP: a big train timetable
  de TP: ein großer Zugfahrplan
  EN FP: a school timetable
  de FP: ein Stundenplan
786 | tired (adjective): needing rest or sleep | loc: müde
  EN TS: He is a little tired.
  de TS: Er ist ein kleines bisschen müde.
  EN FS: He is not tired at all.
  de FS: Er ist überhaupt nicht müde.
  EN TP: tired after work
  de TP: müde nach der Arbeit
  EN FP: tired of waiting
  de FP: müde vom Warten
787 | to judge (verb): to form a critical opinion about someone | loc: verurteilen
  EN TS: She does not judge her friend.
  de TS: Sie verurteilt ihre Freundin nicht.
  EN FS: She does not judge her dog.
  de FS: Sie verurteilt ihren Hund nicht.
  EN TP: not judging a friend
  de TP: eine Freundin nicht verurteilen
  EN FP: judging a cooking contest
  de FP: einen Kochwettbewerb bewerten
788 | to microwave (verb): to heat food in a microwave oven | loc: in der Mikrowelle erhitzen
  EN TS: She wants the microwave next.
  de TS: Sie will als Nächste was in der Mikrowelle erhitzen.
  EN FS: She wants the oven next.
  de FS: Sie will als Nächste was im Ofen erhitzen.
  EN TP: microwaving a noodle bowl
  de TP: Nudeln in der Mikrowelle erhitzen
  EN FP: microwaving a cup of milk
  de FP: Milch in der Mikrowelle erhitzen
789 | toaster (noun): a machine that makes bread brown and crispy | loc: Toaster
  EN TS: The toaster fired the toast!
  de TS: Der Toaster hat den Toast abgefeuert!
  EN FS: The oven fired the toast!
  de FS: Der Ofen hat den Toast abgefeuert!
  EN TP: a popping toaster
  de TP: Toast springt aus dem Toaster
  EN FP: a toaster oven
  de FP: ein Minibackofen
790 | tomato (noun): a soft red fruit used in salads and sauces | loc: Tomate
  EN TS: Nice work with that tomato.
  de TS: Du kannst ja mit Tomaten umgehen.
  EN FS: Nice work with that onion.
  de FS: Du kannst ja mit Zwiebeln umgehen.
  EN TP: slicing a ripe tomato
  de TP: eine reife Tomate schneiden
  EN FP: planting a tomato
  de FP: eine Tomate pflanzen
791 | tool (noun): a thing you hold to help you fix or make things | loc: Werkzeug
  EN TS: He picked the wrong tool first.
  de TS: Er hat zuerst das falsche Werkzeug genommen.
  EN FS: He picked the right tool first.
  de FS: Er hat zuerst das richtige Werkzeug genommen.
  EN TP: picking the right tool
  de TP: das richtige Werkzeug wählen
  EN FP: a tool for the garden
  de FP: ein Gartenwerkzeug
792 | toothpaste (noun): a cream you put on a brush to clean teeth | loc: Zahnpasta
  EN TS: Way too much toothpaste!
  de TS: Viel zu viel Zahnpasta!
  EN FS: Way too much shampoo!
  de FS: Viel zu viel Shampoo!
  EN TP: a tower of toothpaste
  de TP: ein Turm aus Zahnpasta
  EN FP: a tube of toothpaste
  de FP: eine Tube Zahnpasta
793 | top (noun): the highest part or point of something | loc: Spitze
  EN TS: She put the last stone on top.
  de TS: Sie hat den letzten Stein auf die Spitze gelegt.
  EN FS: She put the last shell on top.
  de FS: Sie hat die letzte Muschel auf die Spitze gelegt.
  EN TP: a stone on the top
  de TP: ein Stein auf der Spitze
  EN FP: the top of a car
  de FP: das Dach eines Autos
794 | tournament (noun): a series of matches until one winner is left | loc: Turnier
  EN TS: The boy won the tournament!
  de TS: Der Junge hat das Turnier gewonnen!
  EN FS: The sailor won the tournament!
  de FS: Der Seemann hat das Turnier gewonnen!
  EN TP: an arm-wrestling tournament
  de TP: ein Armdrück-Turnier
  EN FP: a chess tournament
  de FP: ein Schachturnier
795 | towel (noun): a soft cloth for drying yourself | loc: Handtuch
  EN TS: The dog gets the towel too!
  de TS: Der Hund kriegt auch das Handtuch!
  EN FS: The cat gets the towel too!
  de FS: Die Katze kriegt auch das Handtuch!
  EN TP: drying off with a towel
  de TP: sich mit dem Handtuch abtrocknen
  EN FP: lying on a beach towel
  de FP: auf einem Strandtuch liegen
797 | track (noun): an oval path for running races | loc: Laufbahn
  EN TS: They are racing on the track!
  de TS: Sie liefern sich ein Rennen auf der Laufbahn!
  EN FS: They are racing in the pool!
  de FS: Sie liefern sich ein Rennen im Pool!
  EN TP: a red running track
  de TP: eine rote Laufbahn
  EN FP: a train track
  de FP: ein Bahngleis
798 | tracksuit (noun): a matching zip jacket and loose trousers | loc: Trainingsanzug
  EN TS: Tracksuit gang in the alley!
  de TS: Trainingsanzug-Gang in der Gasse!
  EN FS: Tracksuit gang on the beach!
  de FS: Trainingsanzug-Gang am Strand!
  EN TP: matching turquoise tracksuits
  de TP: passende türkise Trainingsanzüge
  EN FP: tracksuits on a running track
  de FP: Trainingsanzüge auf der Laufbahn
800 | training (noun): practising a sport to get better at it | loc: Training
  EN TS: Training done, legs gone.
  de TS: Training vorbei, Beine weg.
  EN FS: Match done, legs gone.
  de FS: Spiel vorbei, Beine weg.
  EN TP: training under floodlights
  de TP: Training unter Flutlicht
  EN FP: training a puppy
  de FP: Welpentraining
801 | trampoline (noun): a stretchy mat on a frame you bounce on | loc: Trampolin
  EN TS: She is flying on a trampoline!
  de TS: Sie fliegt auf dem Trampolin!
  EN FS: She is flying on a bed!
  de FS: Sie fliegt auf dem Bett!
  EN TP: bouncing on a trampoline
  de TP: auf dem Trampolin springen
  EN FP: hiding under a trampoline
  de FP: sich unter dem Trampolin verstecken
802 | trash can (noun): a container you put rubbish in | loc: Mülleimer
  EN TS: He is playing LeBron over a trash can.
  de TS: Er spielt LeBron mit einem Mülleimer als Korb.
  EN FS: He is playing LeBron over a bathtub.
  de FS: Er spielt LeBron mit einer Badewanne als Korb.
  EN TP: a trash can hoop
  de TP: ein Mülleimer als Basketballkorb
  EN FP: a trash can lid
  de FP: ein Mülleimerdeckel
804 | travel (verb): to go to other places, often far away | loc: reisen
  EN TS: She totally loves to travel.
  de TS: Sie liebt es total zu reisen.
  EN FS: She totally hates to travel.
  de FS: Sie hasst es total zu reisen.
  EN TP: to travel by plane
  de TP: mit dem Flugzeug reisen
  EN FP: to travel by bus
  de FP: mit dem Bus reisen
805 | traveling (noun): going on trips to other places | loc: Reisen
  EN TS: Traveling by train, just in time!
  de TS: Reisen mit dem Zug, gerade noch rechtzeitig!
  EN FS: Traveling by bus, just in time!
  de FS: Reisen mit dem Bus, gerade noch rechtzeitig!
  EN TP: traveling through the Alps
  de TP: Reisen durch die Alpen
  EN FP: traveling by ship
  de FP: Reisen mit dem Schiff
806 | tray (noun): a flat board for carrying food and drinks | loc: Tablett
  EN TS: She carries trays like a pro.
  de TS: Sie trägt Tabletts wie ein Profi.
  EN FS: She carries boxes like a pro.
  de FS: Sie trägt Kisten wie ein Profi.
  EN TP: a tray held high
  de TP: ein hochgehaltenes Tablett
  EN FP: a tray on the floor
  de FP: ein Tablett auf dem Boden
807 | treadmill (noun): a gym machine with a moving belt to run on | loc: Laufband
  EN TS: The treadmill almost won, bro.
  de TS: Das Laufband hat fast gewonnen, Bro.
  EN FS: The bike almost won, bro.
  de FS: Das Fahrrad hat fast gewonnen, Bro.
  EN TP: running on a treadmill
  de TP: auf dem Laufband rennen
  EN FP: walking on a treadmill
  de FP: auf dem Laufband gehen
808 | tree (noun): a tall plant with a wooden trunk and branches | loc: Baum
  EN TS: The tree is huge!
  de TS: Der Baum ist riesig!
  EN FS: The rock is huge!
  de FS: Der Felsen ist riesig!
  EN TP: a huge old tree
  de TP: ein riesiger alter Baum
  EN FP: a tree house
  de FP: ein Baumhaus
809 | trend (noun): a style that suddenly everyone follows | loc: der Trend
  EN TS: Even the corgi follows the trend!
  de TS: Sogar der Corgi macht den Trend mit!
  EN FS: Even the cat follows the trend!
  de FS: Sogar die Katze macht den Trend mit!
  EN TP: following the yellow hat trend
  de TP: der Trend mit gelben Hüten
  EN FP: starting a new trend
  de FP: einen neuen Trend starten
811 | trophy (noun): a cup or prize you get for winning | loc: Trophäe
  EN TS: Trophy up, confetti down!
  de TS: Trophäe hoch, Konfetti runter!
  EN FS: Medal up, confetti down!
  de FS: Medaille hoch, Konfetti runter!
  EN TP: lifting a gold trophy
  de TP: eine goldene Trophäe hochheben
  EN FP: cleaning a gold trophy
  de FP: eine goldene Trophäe putzen
812 | trust (noun): the feeling that you can rely on someone | loc: das Vertrauen
  EN TS: Total trust: she's letting go of the rock!
  de TS: Volles Vertrauen: Sie lässt den Felsen los!
  EN FS: Total trust: she's letting go of the rope!
  de FS: Volles Vertrauen: Sie lässt das Seil los!
  EN TP: trust in her partner
  de TP: Vertrauen in ihren Partner
  EN FP: trust in her luck
  de FP: Vertrauen in ihr Glück
813 | turkey (noun): a big farm bird with a red neck and fan tail | loc: Truthahn
  EN TS: The turkey is posing like a star.
  de TS: Der Truthahn posiert wie ein Star.
  EN FS: The goose is posing like a star.
  de FS: Die Gans posiert wie ein Star.
  EN TP: a turkey on the hay
  de TP: ein Truthahn im Heu
  EN FP: a turkey on a plate
  de FP: ein Truthahn auf einem Teller
814 | turn off (verb): to stop a machine or light with a switch | loc: ausschalten | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is turning off the fan.
  de TS: Sie schaltet den Ventilator aus.
  EN FS: She is turning off the TV.
  de FS: Sie schaltet den Fernseher aus.
  EN TP: to turn off the light
  de TP: das Licht ausschalten
  EN FP: to turn off the road
  de FP: von der Straße abbiegen
815 | turtle (noun): a sea animal with a hard shell on its back | loc: Schildkröte
  EN TS: The turtle is in the sea now.
  de TS: Die Schildkröte ist jetzt im Meer.
  EN FS: The turtle is in a pool now.
  de FS: Die Schildkröte ist jetzt in einem Pool.
  EN TP: a turtle on the beach
  de TP: eine Schildkröte am Strand
  EN FP: a turtle in a tank
  de FP: eine Schildkröte im Aquarium
816 | tuxedo (noun): a formal black suit worn with a bow tie | loc: der Smoking
  EN TS: He looks great in a tuxedo.
  de TS: Im Smoking sieht er super aus.
  EN FS: He looks great in a tracksuit.
  de FS: Im Trainingsanzug sieht er super aus.
  EN TP: putting on a tuxedo
  de TP: einen Smoking anziehen
  EN FP: renting a tuxedo
  de FP: einen Smoking ausleihen
817 | side by side (phrase): next to each other, close together in a row | loc: nebeneinander
  EN TS: Two cats are side by side.
  de TS: Die zwei Katzen sind direkt nebeneinander.
  EN FS: Two dogs are side by side.
  de FS: Die zwei Hunde sind direkt nebeneinander.
  EN TP: two cats side by side
  de TP: zwei Katzen nebeneinander
  EN FP: two cats face to face
  de FP: zwei Katzen einander gegenüber
818 | typing (noun): pressing keys to write on a keyboard | loc: Tippen
  EN TS: Her typing is super fast!
  de TS: Ihr Tippen ist mega schnell!
  EN FS: Her reading is super fast!
  de FS: Ihr Lesen ist mega schnell!
  EN TP: fast typing
  de TP: schnelles Tippen
  EN FP: typing a text message
  de FP: eine Nachricht tippen
819 | umbrella (noun): a folding cover that keeps rain off you | loc: Regenschirm
  EN TS: Nice umbrella. Room for me?
  de TS: Schöner Regenschirm. Noch Platz für mich?
  EN FS: Nice car. Room for me?
  de FS: Schönes Auto. Noch Platz für mich?
  EN TP: sharing an umbrella
  de TP: einen Regenschirm teilen
  EN FP: an umbrella on the beach
  de FP: ein Schirm am Strand
821 | underwear (noun): the clothes worn next to your skin | loc: Unterwäsche
  EN TS: Home again: underwear time!
  de TS: Endlich zu Hause: Zeit für Unterwäsche!
  EN FS: Home again: pyjama time!
  de FS: Endlich zu Hause: Zeit für den Schlafanzug!
  EN TP: stripping down to underwear
  de TP: sich bis auf die Unterwäsche ausziehen
  EN FP: buying new underwear
  de FP: neue Unterwäsche kaufen
823 | screen (noun): the flat glass part of a computer, TV or phone | loc: Bildschirm
  EN TS: The screen shows the numbers.
  de TS: Der Bildschirm zeigt die Zahlen.
  EN FS: The screen shows the weather.
  de FS: Der Bildschirm zeigt das Wetter.
  EN TP: pointing at the screen
  de TP: auf den Bildschirm zeigen
  EN FP: cleaning the screen
  de FP: den Bildschirm putzen
825 | view (noun): the land or sea you can see from a place | loc: Aussicht
  EN TS: The dog loves the view too.
  de TS: Der Hund liebt die Aussicht auch.
  EN FS: The cat loves the view too.
  de FS: Die Katze liebt die Aussicht auch.
  EN TP: a view of rocky peaks
  de TP: Aussicht auf felsige Gipfel
  EN FP: a view of the sea
  de FP: Aussicht aufs Meer
826 | film (verb): to record moving pictures with a camera | loc: filmen
  EN TS: They are filming in an office.
  de TS: Sie filmen in einem Büro.
  EN FS: They are filming in a forest.
  de FS: Sie filmen in einem Wald.
  EN TP: filming with a camera dolly
  de TP: mit einem Kamerawagen filmen
  EN FP: filming a wedding
  de FP: eine Hochzeit filmen
827 | animal (noun): a living thing that moves, like a dog or a bird | loc: Tier
  EN TS: There are many animals here.
  de TS: Hier sind viele Tiere.
  EN FS: There are two animals here.
  de FS: Hier sind zwei Tiere.
  EN TP: animals in a storybook
  de TP: Tiere in einem Bilderbuch
  EN FP: animals in a real zoo
  de FP: Tiere in einem echten Zoo
828 | surprised (adjective): feeling shock at something unexpected | loc: überrascht
  EN TS: Hot news? She looks surprised.
  de TS: Heiße News? Sie wirkt überrascht.
  EN FS: Hot news? He looks surprised.
  de FS: Heiße News? Er wirkt überrascht.
  EN TP: surprised in a cafe
  de TP: überrascht im Café
  EN FP: surprised at the door
  de FP: überrascht an der Tür
830 | explain (verb): to make something clear to someone | loc: erklären
  EN TS: She is explaining the changes.
  de TS: Sie erklärt die Änderungen.
  EN FS: She is explaining the menu.
  de FS: Sie erklärt die Speisekarte.
  EN TP: explaining the app design
  de TP: das App-Design erklären
  EN FP: explaining a maths problem
  de FP: eine Matheaufgabe erklären
831 | speech (noun): a formal talk given to an audience | loc: Rede
  EN TS: She is giving a speech.
  de TS: Sie hält eine Rede.
  EN FS: She is giving a concert.
  de FS: Sie gibt ein Konzert.
  EN TP: a speech at a podium
  de TP: eine Rede am Rednerpult
  EN FP: a speech at a wedding
  de FP: eine Rede auf einer Hochzeit
832 | unpack (verb): to take things out of a bag or case | loc: auspacken | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is unpacking the longest scarf ever.
  de TS: Er packt den längsten Schal der Welt aus.
  EN FS: He is unpacking the longest sock ever.
  de FS: Er packt die längste Socke der Welt aus.
  EN TP: unpacking a suitcase
  de TP: einen Koffer auspacken
  EN FP: unpacking the shopping
  de FP: die Einkäufe auspacken
833 | unpacking (noun): taking things out of a bag or suitcase | loc: Auspacken
  EN TS: Unpacking: the shell survived!
  de TS: Auspacken: Die Muschel hat überlebt!
  EN FS: Unpacking: the mug survived!
  de FS: Auspacken: Die Tasse hat überlebt!
  EN TP: unpacking after a trip
  de TP: Auspacken nach der Reise
  EN FP: unpacking a new phone
  de FP: ein neues Handy auspacken
834 | hostess (noun): a woman who invites guests and looks after them | loc: Gastgeberin
  EN TS: The hostess is done with them.
  de TS: Die Gastgeberin hat genug von ihnen.
  EN FS: The waiter is done with them.
  de FS: Der Kellner hat genug von ihnen.
  EN TP: a busy hostess serving guests
  de TP: eine Gastgeberin bewirtet Gäste
  EN FP: an air hostess
  de FP: eine Flugbegleiterin
835 | plumber (noun): a worker who fixes pipes and sinks | loc: Klempner
  EN TS: The fake plumber got soaked!
  de TS: Der falsche Klempner wurde klatschnass!
  EN FS: The fake plumber got rich!
  de FS: Der falsche Klempner wurde steinreich!
  EN TP: a plumber at the sink
  de TP: ein Klempner an der Spüle
  EN FP: a plumber on the roof
  de FP: ein Klempner auf dem Dach
836 | prepared (adjective): ready because you organized everything in advance | loc: vorbereitet
  EN TS: He is very prepared. Too prepared.
  de TS: Er ist sehr gut vorbereitet. Zu gut.
  EN FS: She is very prepared. Too prepared.
  de FS: Sie ist sehr gut vorbereitet. Zu gut.
  EN TP: a prepared student
  de TP: ein vorbereiteter Schüler
  EN FP: a prepared meal
  de FP: ein vorbereitetes Essen
837 | taxi (noun): a car you pay to drive you somewhere | loc: Taxi
  EN TS: This taxi fits in any alley.
  de TS: Dieses Taxi passt in jede Gasse.
  EN FS: This bus fits in any alley.
  de FS: Dieser Bus passt in jede Gasse.
  EN TP: a taxi in an alley
  de TP: ein Taxi in einer Gasse
  EN FP: a taxi at the airport
  de FP: ein Taxi am Flughafen
838 | pilot (noun): a person who flies a plane | loc: Pilot
  EN TS: The pilot thinks he is a star.
  de TS: Der Pilot hält sich für einen Star.
  EN FS: The chef thinks he is a star.
  de FS: Der Koch hält sich für einen Star.
  EN TP: a pilot in a jacket
  de TP: ein Pilot in Jacke
  EN FP: a pilot in a plane
  de FP: ein Pilot im Flugzeug
839 | extend (verb): to make something longer or bigger | loc: verlängern
  EN TS: He is extending his table!
  de TS: Er verlängert seinen Tisch!
  EN FS: He is extending his bed!
  de FS: Er verlängert sein Bett!
  EN TP: extending a dining table
  de TP: einen Esstisch verlängern
  EN FP: extending a visa
  de FP: ein Visum verlängern
840 | hike (verb): to walk a long way in mountains or countryside | loc: wandern
  EN TS: He hiked up just for a selfie.
  de TS: Er ist nur für ein Selfie hochgewandert.
  EN FS: He swam out just for a selfie.
  de FS: Er ist nur für ein Selfie rausgeschwommen.
  EN TP: hiking up to a lake
  de TP: zu einem See hochwandern
  EN FP: hiking down to a beach
  de FP: zu einem Strand runterwandern
841 | melt (verb): to turn from solid to liquid when heated | loc: schmelzen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She melted the ice. Now what?
  de TS: Sie hat das Eis geschmolzen. Und jetzt?
  EN FS: She froze the water. Now what?
  de FS: Sie hat das Wasser eingefroren. Und jetzt?
  EN TP: to melt ice cubes
  de TP: Eiswürfel schmelzen
  EN FP: to melt chocolate
  de FP: Schokolade schmelzen
842 | baby (noun): a very young child who cannot walk or talk yet | loc: Baby
  EN TS: The baby wants every letter.
  de TS: Das Baby will jeden Buchstaben.
  EN FS: The baby wants every biscuit.
  de FS: Das Baby will jeden Keks.
  EN TP: a baby playing with letters
  de TP: ein Baby spielt mit Buchstaben
  EN FP: a baby playing with food
  de FP: ein Baby spielt mit Essen
843 | up (adverb): toward a higher place | loc: hoch
  EN TS: Higher! The basket is going up!
  de TS: Höher! Der Korb geht hoch!
  EN FS: Higher! The bucket is going up!
  de FS: Höher! Der Eimer geht hoch!
  EN TP: to pull a basket up
  de TP: einen Korb hochziehen
  EN FP: to pull a boat up
  de FP: ein Boot hochziehen
844 | valley (noun): the low land between mountains | loc: das Tal
  EN TS: What a huge green valley!
  de TS: Was für ein riesiges grünes Tal!
  EN FS: What a huge green desert!
  de FS: Was für eine riesige grüne Wüste!
  EN TP: a green valley below
  de TP: ein grünes Tal in der Tiefe
  EN FP: a valley under snow
  de FP: ein verschneites Tal
845 | vanishing (noun): disappearing suddenly and completely | loc: verschwinden
  EN TS: Another vanishing! Thanks, sea.
  de TS: Wieder ein Verschwinden! Danke, Meer.
  EN FS: Another vanishing! Thanks, dog.
  de FS: Wieder ein Verschwinden! Danke, Hund.
  EN TP: the vanishing of a drawing
  de TP: das Verschwinden einer Zeichnung
  EN FP: the vanishing of a ship
  de FP: das Verschwinden eines Schiffs
847 | victory (noun): winning a competition or a race | loc: der Sieg
  EN TS: Their victory is clear.
  de TS: Ihr Sieg ist eindeutig.
  EN FS: Their defeat is clear.
  de FS: Ihre Niederlage ist eindeutig.
  EN TP: a boat race victory
  de TP: ein Sieg beim Bootsrennen
  EN FP: a chess game victory
  de FP: ein Sieg beim Schach
848 | vinegar (noun): a sour liquid used to flavour food | loc: der Essig
  EN TS: Vinegar? Her face says no!
  de TS: Essig? Ihr Gesicht sagt Nein!
  EN FS: Honey? Her face says no!
  de FS: Honig? Ihr Gesicht sagt Nein!
  EN TP: a splash of vinegar
  de TP: ein Schuss Essig
  EN FP: cleaning with vinegar
  de FP: mit Essig putzen
849 | visa (noun): a sticker in a passport that lets you enter | loc: das Visum
  EN TS: He got his visa!
  de TS: Er hat sein Visum bekommen!
  EN FS: He lost his visa!
  de FS: Er hat sein Visum verloren!
  EN TP: a visa in a passport
  de TP: ein Visum im Reisepass
  EN FP: a visa for a holiday
  de FP: ein Visum für den Urlaub
850 | volcano (noun): a mountain that erupts fire and melted rock | loc: der Vulkan
  EN TS: The volcano is smoking. Nobody panic.
  de TS: Der Vulkan raucht. Keine Panik.
  EN FS: The chimney is smoking. Nobody panic.
  de FS: Der Schornstein raucht. Keine Panik.
  EN TP: a smoking volcano
  de TP: ein rauchender Vulkan
  EN FP: a volcano under the sea
  de FP: ein Vulkan unter dem Meer
851 | wait (verb): to stay somewhere until something happens | loc: warten
  EN TS: She is waiting. And waiting.
  de TS: Sie wartet. Und wartet.
  EN FS: She is dancing. And dancing.
  de FS: Sie tanzt. Und tanzt.
  EN TP: to wait for the bus
  de TP: auf den Bus warten
  EN FP: to wait for a taxi
  de FP: auf ein Taxi warten
852 | waiter (noun): a person who brings food in a restaurant | loc: Kellner
  EN TS: The waiter is very fast!
  de TS: Der Kellner ist voll schnell!
  EN FS: The waiter is very slow!
  de FS: Der Kellner ist voll langsam!
  EN TP: a waiter with plates
  de TP: ein Kellner mit Tellern
  EN FP: a waiter with a menu
  de FP: ein Kellner mit Speisekarte
853 | walk (verb): to go somewhere on foot, step by step | loc: gehen
  EN TS: She is walking in the park.
  de TS: Sie geht durch den Park.
  EN FS: She is running in the park.
  de FS: Sie rennt durch den Park.
  EN TP: to walk by the lake
  de TP: am See entlanggehen
  EN FP: to walk the dog
  de FP: mit dem Hund Gassi gehen
855 | walking (noun): going somewhere on foot for fun or exercise | loc: Spazierengehen
  EN TS: They are walking by the sea.
  de TS: Sie gehen am Meer spazieren.
  EN FS: They are running by the sea.
  de FS: Sie joggen am Meer.
  EN TP: walking by the sea
  de TP: Spazierengehen am Meer
  EN FP: walking in the mountains
  de FP: Spazierengehen in den Bergen
857 | wallet (noun): a small flat case for money and cards | loc: Geldbörse
  EN TS: He found her wallet and got a flower.
  de TS: Er hat ihre Geldbörse gefunden und eine Blume bekommen.
  EN FS: He found her wallet and got a cake.
  de FS: Er hat ihre Geldbörse gefunden und einen Kuchen bekommen.
  EN TP: returning a lost wallet
  de TP: eine verlorene Geldbörse zurückgeben
  EN FP: stealing a lost wallet
  de FP: eine verlorene Geldbörse stehlen
859 | wardrobe (noun): a tall cupboard where clothes hang and are stored | loc: Kleiderschrank
  EN TS: The wardrobe attacked her!
  de TS: Der Kleiderschrank hat sie angegriffen!
  EN FS: The fridge attacked her!
  de FS: Der Kühlschrank hat sie angegriffen!
  EN TP: a wardrobe full of coats
  de TP: ein Kleiderschrank voller Mäntel
  EN FP: a wardrobe full of shoes
  de FP: ein Kleiderschrank voller Schuhe
860 | washing (noun): cleaning something with water and soap | loc: Waschen
  EN TS: The car needed a "little" washing.
  de TS: Beim Auto war „ein bisschen“ Waschen fällig.
  EN FS: The bike needed a "little" washing.
  de FS: Beim Fahrrad war „ein bisschen“ Waschen fällig.
  EN TP: washing a muddy car
  de TP: ein schlammiges Auto waschen
  EN FP: washing a muddy dog
  de FP: einen schlammigen Hund waschen
861 | watch (noun): a small clock you wear on your wrist | loc: Armbanduhr
  EN TS: His watch says: late!
  de TS: Seine Armbanduhr sagt: zu spät!
  EN FS: His phone says: late!
  de FS: Sein Handy sagt: zu spät!
  EN TP: checking a watch
  de TP: auf die Armbanduhr schauen
  EN FP: buying a watch
  de FP: eine Armbanduhr kaufen
862 | watching (noun): looking at something for a while, like a film | loc: Zuschauen
  EN TS: TV watching needs popcorn.
  de TS: Fernsehabend: Beim Zuschauen muss Popcorn her.
  EN FS: TV watching needs pizza.
  de FS: Fernsehabend: Beim Zuschauen muss Pizza her.
  EN TP: a night of TV watching
  de TP: ein Abend Zuschauen vorm Fernseher
  EN FP: a night of bird watching
  de FP: ein Abend Vogelbeobachtung
863 | water bottle (noun): a container you carry to drink from on the go | loc: Wasserflasche
  EN TS: Her water bottle is metal.
  de TS: Ihre Wasserflasche ist aus Metall.
  EN FS: Her water bottle is plastic.
  de FS: Ihre Wasserflasche ist aus Plastik.
  EN TP: filling a water bottle
  de TP: eine Wasserflasche füllen
  EN FP: a water bottle in bed
  de FP: eine Wasserflasche im Bett
864 | water (noun): the clear liquid in rivers, rain and seas | loc: Wasser
  EN TS: This water is crazy clear.
  de TS: Dieses Wasser ist krass klar.
  EN FS: This milk is crazy clear.
  de FS: Diese Milch ist krass klar.
  EN TP: clear water in a bottle
  de TP: klares Wasser in einer Flasche
  EN FP: water in a plastic cup
  de FP: Wasser in einem Plastikbecher
866 | waterfall (noun): water falling straight down from a high rock | loc: der Wasserfall
  EN TS: A rainbow at the waterfall!
  de TS: Ein Regenbogen am Wasserfall!
  EN FS: A rainbow at the lake!
  de FS: Ein Regenbogen am See!
  EN TP: a tall waterfall in Iceland
  de TP: ein hoher Wasserfall in Island
  EN FP: a waterfall in a garden
  de FP: ein Wasserfall im Garten
867 | watering (noun): giving plants a drink so they grow | loc: Gießen
  EN TS: The basil likes the watering.
  de TS: Das Basilikum mag das Gießen.
  EN FS: The rose likes the watering.
  de FS: Die Rose mag das Gießen.
  EN TP: watering the tomatoes
  de TP: die Tomaten gießen
  EN FP: watering the lawn
  de FP: den Rasen gießen
868 | wave (noun): a wall of water moving across the sea | loc: Welle
  EN TS: Just a small wave.
  de TS: Nur eine kleine Welle.
  EN FS: Just a small shark.
  de FS: Nur ein kleiner Hai.
  EN TP: a wave crashing on swimmers
  de TP: eine Welle bricht über Schwimmer
  EN FP: a wave of the hand
  de FP: ein Winken mit der Hand
869 | weight (noun): a heavy object you lift to build strength | loc: Gewicht
  EN TS: She is carrying a weight.
  de TS: Sie trägt ein Gewicht.
  EN FS: She is carrying a box.
  de FS: Sie trägt eine Kiste.
  EN TP: a heavy round weight
  de TP: ein schweres rundes Gewicht
  EN FP: losing weight fast
  de FP: schnell Gewicht verlieren
870 | west (noun): the direction where the sun goes down | loc: Westen
  EN TS: The sun sets in the west.
  de TS: Die Sonne geht im Westen unter.
  EN FS: The sun sets in the east.
  de FS: Die Sonne geht im Osten unter.
  EN TP: watching the sun go west
  de TP: die Sonne im Westen sinken sehen
  EN FP: driving west at night
  de FP: nachts nach Westen fahren
871 | wheelchair (noun): a chair on wheels for someone who cannot walk | loc: der Rollstuhl
  EN TS: He scored from his wheelchair!
  de TS: Er punktet aus dem Rollstuhl!
  EN FS: He missed from his wheelchair!
  de FS: Er vergibt aus dem Rollstuhl!
  EN TP: a sports wheelchair on court
  de TP: ein Sportrollstuhl auf dem Platz
  EN FP: a wheelchair in a hospital
  de FP: ein Rollstuhl im Krankenhaus
872 | whistling (noun): making a high sound by blowing through your lips | loc: Pfeifen
  EN TS: Her whistling works at last!
  de TS: Ihr Pfeifen klappt endlich!
  EN FS: Her singing works at last!
  de FS: Ihr Singen klappt endlich!
  EN TP: whistling at a garden table
  de TP: Pfeifen am Gartentisch
  EN FP: whistling at a football game
  de FP: Pfeifen beim Fußballspiel
873 | wife (noun): the woman someone is married to | loc: Ehefrau
  EN TS: His wife can flip pancakes!
  de TS: Seine Ehefrau kann Pfannkuchen wenden!
  EN FS: His wife can flip burgers!
  de FS: Seine Ehefrau kann Burger wenden!
  EN TP: a wife flipping pancakes
  de TP: eine Ehefrau wendet Pfannkuchen
  EN FP: a wife baking a cake
  de FP: eine Ehefrau backt Kuchen
874 | wig (noun): false hair you wear on your head | loc: Perücke
  EN TS: The pink wig suits her.
  de TS: Die pinke Perücke steht ihr.
  EN FS: The pink hat suits her.
  de FS: Der pinke Hut steht ihr.
  EN TP: putting on a pink wig
  de TP: eine pinke Perücke aufsetzen
  EN FP: brushing a pink wig
  de FP: eine pinke Perücke bürsten
875 | wind (noun): moving air you feel outside | loc: Wind
  EN TS: The wind stole her scarf!
  de TS: Der Wind hat ihr den Schal geklaut!
  EN FS: The wind stole her hat!
  de FS: Der Wind hat ihr den Hut geklaut!
  EN TP: a scarf in the wind
  de TP: ein Schal im Wind
  EN FP: wind blowing snow
  de FP: Wind wirbelt Schnee auf
876 | wine (noun): an alcoholic drink made from grapes | loc: Wein
  EN TS: Red wine at sunset? Classy move.
  de TS: Rotwein zum Sonnenuntergang? Stilvoll.
  EN FS: Cold beer at sunset? Classy move.
  de FS: Kaltes Bier zum Sonnenuntergang? Stilvoll.
  EN TP: a glass of red wine
  de TP: ein Glas Rotwein
  EN FP: a bottle of white wine
  de FP: eine Flasche Weißwein
877 | winner (noun): the person who comes first in a race or game | loc: Sieger
  EN TS: Muddy winner? Legend!
  de TS: Sieger voller Schlamm? Legende!
  EN FS: Clean winner? Legend!
  de FS: Sieger ganz sauber? Legende!
  EN TP: winner of a mud race
  de TP: Sieger eines Schlammlaufs
  EN FP: winner of a swim race
  de FP: Sieger eines Schwimmrennens
878 | winter (noun): the coldest season of the year | loc: Winter
  EN TS: Winter fun on sleds!
  de TS: Winterspaß auf Schlitten!
  EN FS: Winter fun on skis!
  de FS: Winterspaß auf Skiern!
  EN TP: a winter day on sleds
  de TP: ein Wintertag mit Schlitten
  EN FP: a winter day indoors
  de FP: ein Wintertag drinnen
879 | wolf (noun): a wild animal like a big dog that hunts in packs | loc: der Wolf
  EN TS: The wolf is howling!
  de TS: Der Wolf heult!
  EN FS: The wolf is sleeping!
  de FS: Der Wolf schläft!
  EN TP: a wolf in the snow
  de TP: ein Wolf im Schnee
  EN FP: a wolf on a beach
  de FP: ein Wolf am Strand
880 | wool (noun): the soft hair of sheep used to make clothes | loc: Wolle
  EN TS: The lamb is wearing its own wool!
  de TS: Das Lamm trägt seine eigene Wolle!
  EN FS: The lamb is wearing a wool hat!
  de FS: Das Lamm trägt eine Wollmütze!
  EN TP: a ball of wool
  de TP: ein Knäuel Wolle
  EN FP: a wool blanket
  de FP: eine Wolldecke
882 | workout (noun): a session of hard exercise to get fit | loc: Workout
  EN TS: The dog is her workout coach.
  de TS: Der Hund ist ihr Workout-Coach.
  EN FS: The cat is her workout coach.
  de FS: Die Katze ist ihr Workout-Coach.
  EN TP: a full workout
  de TP: ein komplettes Workout
  EN FP: a workout on the beach
  de FP: ein Workout am Strand
884 | world (noun): everything on Earth, all people and places | loc: Welt
  EN TS: She is showing him the world.
  de TS: Sie zeigt ihm die Welt.
  EN FS: She is showing him the map.
  de FS: Sie zeigt ihm die Karte.
  EN TP: a world of city lights
  de TP: eine Welt aus Stadtlichtern
  EN FP: a map of the world
  de FP: eine Weltkarte
885 | worm (noun): a long thin soft animal that lives in soil | loc: Regenwurm
  EN TS: The worm is going underground.
  de TS: Der Regenwurm verschwindet unter der Erde.
  EN FS: The worm is going up a tree.
  de FS: Der Regenwurm klettert auf einen Baum.
  EN TP: a worm in the soil
  de TP: ein Regenwurm in der Erde
  EN FP: a worm on a hook
  de FP: ein Wurm am Angelhaken
886 | wrinkle (noun): a small line or fold in the skin | loc: die Falte
  EN TS: Grandma earned her wrinkles.
  de TS: Oma hat sich ihre Falten verdient.
  EN FS: The girl earned her wrinkles.
  de FS: Das Mädchen hat sich ihre Falten verdient.
  EN TP: deep wrinkles on her face
  de TP: tiefe Falten im Gesicht
  EN FP: wrinkles in a shirt
  de FP: Falten im Hemd
887 | write (verb): to put words on paper with a pen | loc: schreiben
  EN TS: She is writing in her journal.
  de TS: Sie schreibt in ihr Tagebuch.
  EN FS: She is writing on her laptop.
  de FS: Sie schreibt auf ihrem Laptop.
  EN TP: to write in a journal
  de TP: in ein Tagebuch schreiben
  EN FP: to write on a wall
  de FP: an eine Wand schreiben
888 | yawning (noun): opening the mouth wide and breathing in when tired | loc: gähnen
  EN TS: Yawning is contagious, even for dogs.
  de TS: Gähnen ist ansteckend, sogar bei Hunden.
  EN FS: Laughing is contagious, even for dogs.
  de FS: Lachen ist ansteckend, sogar bei Hunden.
  EN TP: yawning in the kitchen
  de TP: Gähnen in der Küche
  EN FP: yawning in the car
  de FP: Gähnen im Auto
889 | yogurt (noun): a thick creamy food made from milk | loc: Joghurt
  EN TS: Her yogurt does not pour!
  de TS: Ihr Joghurt fließt einfach nicht!
  EN FS: Her honey does not pour!
  de FS: Ihr Honig fließt einfach nicht!
  EN TP: a jar of thick yogurt
  de TP: ein Glas dicker Joghurt
  EN FP: drinking yogurt from a jar
  de FP: Joghurt aus dem Glas trinken
891 | expensive (adjective): costing a lot of money | loc: teuer
  EN TS: Oops, that car is expensive!
  de TS: Ups, das Auto ist teuer!
  EN FS: Oops, that bike is expensive!
  de FS: Ups, das Fahrrad ist teuer!
  EN TP: an expensive car ornament
  de TP: eine teure Kühlerfigur
  EN FP: an expensive car wash
  de FP: eine teure Autowäsche
892 | rinse (verb): to wash something quickly with clean water | loc: abspülen | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She's rinsing off seawater.
  de TS: Sie spült das Meerwasser ab.
  EN FS: She's rinsing off the paint.
  de FS: Sie spült die Farbe ab.
  EN TP: rinsing off the seawater
  de TP: das Meerwasser abspülen
  EN FP: rinsing off the dishes
  de FP: das Geschirr abspülen
893 | zip (verb): to close a jacket or bag by sliding its fastener | loc: den Reißverschluss zuziehen
  EN TS: Zipped up and ready for snow.
  de TS: Reißverschluss zugezogen, bereit für den Schnee.
  EN FS: Zipped up and ready for sun.
  de FS: Reißverschluss zugezogen, bereit für die Sonne.
  EN TP: to zip up a jacket
  de TP: den Reißverschluss der Jacke zuziehen
  EN FP: to zip up a suitcase
  de FP: den Reißverschluss am Koffer zuziehen
894 | zipper (noun): a sliding fastener that closes clothes or bags | loc: Reißverschluss
  EN TS: The zipper is stuck!
  de TS: Der Reißverschluss klemmt!
  EN FS: The ski is stuck!
  de FS: Der Ski klemmt!
  EN TP: a stuck jacket zipper
  de TP: ein klemmender Jackenreißverschluss
  EN FP: a zipper on a tent
  de FP: ein Reißverschluss am Zelt
895 | accident (noun): an unfortunate mishap causing damage or injury | loc: Unfall
  EN TS: Big jam. Maybe an accident?
  de TS: Riesenstau. Vielleicht ein Unfall?
  EN FS: Big party. Maybe an accident?
  de FS: Riesenparty. Vielleicht ein Unfall?
  EN TP: an accident on the highway
  de TP: ein Unfall auf der Autobahn
  EN FP: an accident in the kitchen
  de FP: ein Unfall in der Küche
898 | actress (noun): a woman who plays roles in films or plays | loc: Schauspielerin
  EN TS: The actress is spinning.
  de TS: Die Schauspielerin dreht sich.
  EN FS: The actress is sleeping.
  de FS: Die Schauspielerin schläft.
  EN TP: an actress on set
  de TP: eine Schauspielerin am Set
  EN FP: an actress on a poster
  de FP: eine Schauspielerin auf einem Plakat
899 | afternoon (noun): the part of the day between noon and evening | loc: Nachmittag
  EN TS: It is a sunny afternoon.
  de TS: Es ist ein sonniger Nachmittag.
  EN FS: It is a snowy afternoon.
  de FS: Es ist ein verschneiter Nachmittag.
  EN TP: an afternoon in the park
  de TP: ein Nachmittag im Park
  EN FP: an afternoon at the beach
  de FP: ein Nachmittag am Strand
900 | agent (noun): someone who handles business for others | loc: Agent
  EN TS: The agent is on the phone.
  de TS: Der Agent hängt am Telefon.
  EN FS: The agent is on the bus.
  de FS: Der Agent sitzt im Bus.
  EN TP: an agent on the phone
  de TP: ein Agent am Telefon
  EN FP: a travel agent's office
  de FP: ein Reisebüro
901 | air (noun): the gas around us that we breathe | loc: Luft
  EN TS: He is breathing the fresh air, arms wide open.
  de TS: Er atmet die frische Luft, die Arme weit ausgebreitet.
  EN FS: He is breathing the city air, arms wide open.
  de FS: Er atmet die Stadtluft, die Arme weit ausgebreitet.
  EN TP: fresh mountain air
  de TP: frische Bergluft
  EN FP: fresh air in the city
  de FP: frische Luft in der Stadt
902 | airplane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings, powered by jets | loc: Flugzeug
  EN TS: She is waving at the airplane!
  de TS: Sie winkt dem Flugzeug!
  EN FS: She is waving at the train!
  de FS: Sie winkt dem Zug!
  EN TP: a low airplane overhead
  de TP: ein tief fliegendes Flugzeug
  EN FP: a paper airplane
  de FP: ein Papierflieger
904 | allergy (noun): a bad body reaction to pollen or dust | loc: Allergie
  EN TS: She has a pollen allergy.
  de TS: Sie hat eine Pollenallergie.
  EN FS: She has a dust allergy.
  de FS: Sie hat eine Hausstauballergie.
  EN TP: an allergy to pollen
  de TP: eine Allergie gegen Pollen
  EN FP: an allergy to cats
  de FP: eine Allergie gegen Katzen
905 | alley (noun): a very narrow street between buildings | loc: Gasse
  EN TS: A cat is crossing the alley.
  de TS: Eine Katze überquert die Gasse.
  EN FS: A dog is crossing the alley.
  de FS: Ein Hund überquert die Gasse.
  EN TP: a narrow cobbled alley
  de TP: eine enge, gepflasterte Gasse
  EN FP: an alley full of shops
  de FP: eine Gasse voller Läden
907 | anybody (noun): any person at all, it does not matter who | loc: jemand
  EN TS: Is anybody here? Only pigeons.
  de TS: Ist hier jemand? Nur Tauben.
  EN FS: Is anybody here? Only cats.
  de FS: Ist hier jemand? Nur Katzen.
  EN TP: anybody in the station
  de TP: jemand im Bahnhof
  EN FP: anybody at the party
  de FP: jemand auf der Party
909 | anyone (noun): a person, no matter which one | loc: irgendjemand
  EN TS: He is asking if anyone is home.
  de TS: Er fragt, ob irgendjemand zu Hause ist.
  EN FS: She is asking if anyone is home.
  de FS: Sie fragt, ob irgendjemand zu Hause ist.
  EN TP: asking if anyone is home
  de TP: fragen, ob irgendjemand da ist
  EN FP: asking if anyone is hungry
  de FP: fragen, ob irgendjemand Hunger hat
911 | apartment (noun): a set of rooms to live in inside a building | loc: Wohnung
  EN TS: A bright, sunny apartment.
  de TS: Eine helle, sonnige Wohnung.
  EN FS: A dark, gloomy apartment.
  de FS: Eine dunkle, düstere Wohnung.
  EN TP: a bright modern apartment
  de TP: eine helle moderne Wohnung
  EN FP: a bright modern office
  de FP: ein helles modernes Büro
912 | architect (noun): someone whose job is designing buildings | loc: Architekt
  EN TS: The architect has a blueprint.
  de TS: Der Architekt hat einen Bauplan.
  EN FS: The architect has a hammer.
  de FS: Der Architekt hat einen Hammer.
  EN TP: an architect with plans
  de TP: ein Architekt mit Plänen
  EN FP: an architect at the beach
  de FP: ein Architekt am Strand
913 | arm (noun): the human limb between the shoulder and the hand | loc: Arm
  EN TS: Her arm is up high.
  de TS: Ihr Arm ist ganz oben.
  EN FS: Her arm is down low.
  de FS: Ihr Arm ist ganz unten.
  EN TP: an arm stretched up
  de TP: ein nach oben gestreckter Arm
  EN FP: an arm in a sling
  de FP: ein Arm in der Schlinge
914 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: Sessel
  EN TS: He loves this armchair!
  de TS: Er liebt diesen Sessel!
  EN FS: He loves this sofa!
  de FS: Er liebt dieses Sofa!
  EN TP: flopping into an armchair
  de TP: sich in einen Sessel fallen lassen
  EN FP: flopping into a pool
  de FP: sich in einen Pool fallen lassen
916 | atm (noun): the machine in the street that gives you cash | loc: Geldautomat
  EN TS: She is using an ATM.
  de TS: Sie benutzt einen Geldautomaten.
  EN FS: She is using a phone.
  de FS: Sie benutzt ein Handy.
  EN TP: an ATM in the rain
  de TP: ein Geldautomat im Regen
  EN FP: an ATM in a shop
  de FP: ein Geldautomat im Laden
917 | attic (noun): the room under the roof, used for storing things | loc: Dachboden
  EN TS: The attic is full of junk.
  de TS: Der Dachboden ist voller Krempel.
  EN FS: The attic is full of water.
  de FS: Der Dachboden ist voller Wasser.
  EN TP: a dusty old attic
  de TP: ein staubiger alter Dachboden
  EN FP: a bright new attic
  de FP: ein heller neuer Dachboden
918 | audience (noun): the people watching a show or a talk | loc: Publikum
  EN TS: The audience is applauding.
  de TS: Das Publikum applaudiert.
  EN FS: The audience is leaving.
  de FS: Das Publikum geht.
  EN TP: a clapping audience
  de TP: ein klatschendes Publikum
  EN FP: a TV audience
  de FP: ein Fernsehpublikum
919 | aunt (noun): the sister of your mother or father | loc: Tante
  EN TS: Her aunt is a fun one.
  de TS: Ihre Tante ist voll lustig drauf.
  EN FS: Her uncle is a fun one.
  de FS: Ihr Onkel ist voll lustig drauf.
  EN TP: dancing with her aunt
  de TP: mit ihrer Tante tanzen
  EN FP: shopping with her aunt
  de FP: mit ihrer Tante shoppen
920 | austria (noun): a small country in central Europe with the Alps | loc: Österreich
  EN TS: Swinging in Austria? Goals.
  de TS: Schaukeln in Österreich? Goals.
  EN FS: Skiing in Austria? Goals.
  de FS: Skifahren in Österreich? Goals.
  EN TP: swinging in Austria
  de TP: Schaukeln in Österreich
  EN FP: skiing in Austria
  de FP: Skifahren in Österreich
921 | austrian (adjective): from the country with Vienna as its capital | loc: österreichisch
  EN TS: He is serving Austrian cake.
  de TS: Er serviert österreichischen Kuchen.
  EN FS: He is serving Austrian beer.
  de FS: Er serviert österreichisches Bier.
  EN TP: an Austrian coffee house
  de TP: ein österreichisches Kaffeehaus
  EN FP: an Austrian beer hall
  de FP: eine österreichische Bierhalle
925 | baggage claim (noun): the airport area where you collect suitcases | loc: Gepäckausgabe
  EN TS: Her bag is at baggage claim.
  de TS: Ihre Tasche ist an der Gepäckausgabe.
  EN FS: Her bag is at the check-in.
  de FS: Ihre Tasche ist am Check-in.
  EN TP: a bag at baggage claim
  de TP: eine Tasche an der Gepäckausgabe
  EN FP: a bag at security
  de FP: eine Tasche an der Sicherheitskontrolle
926 | baker (noun): someone who bakes bread and cakes as a job | loc: Bäcker
  EN TS: The baker's bread is ready!
  de TS: Das Brot vom Bäcker ist fertig!
  EN FS: The baker's pizza is ready!
  de FS: Die Pizza vom Bäcker ist fertig!
  EN TP: a baker at the oven
  de TP: ein Bäcker am Ofen
  EN FP: a baker at the till
  de FP: ein Bäcker an der Kasse
927 | balcony (noun): an open platform with a railing on a building | loc: Balkon
  EN TS: She is shaking a rug on the balcony.
  de TS: Sie schüttelt auf dem Balkon einen Teppich aus.
  EN FS: She is shaking a towel on the balcony.
  de FS: Sie schüttelt auf dem Balkon ein Handtuch aus.
  EN TP: a rug over the balcony
  de TP: ein Teppich über dem Balkongeländer
  EN FP: a plant on the balcony
  de FP: eine Pflanze auf dem Balkon
929 | bandage (noun): a strip of soft cloth wrapped around a wound | loc: Verband
  EN TS: He is wrapping a bandage.
  de TS: Er wickelt einen Verband.
  EN FS: He is wrapping a present.
  de FS: Er wickelt ein Geschenk ein.
  EN TP: wrapping a white bandage
  de TP: einen weißen Verband wickeln
  EN FP: wrapping a white scarf
  de FP: einen weißen Schal wickeln
933 | bathroom (noun): a room with a bath or shower and a washbasin | loc: Badezimmer
  EN TS: She is in the bathroom.
  de TS: Sie ist im Badezimmer.
  EN FS: She is in the kitchen.
  de FS: Sie ist in der Küche.
  EN TP: washing in the bathroom
  de TP: sich im Badezimmer waschen
  EN FP: cleaning the bathroom
  de FP: das Badezimmer putzen
934 | bathtub (noun): a large container you fill with water to wash in | loc: Badewanne
  EN TS: Splash! She is in the bathtub.
  de TS: Platsch! Sie ist in der Badewanne.
  EN FS: Splash! She is in the pool.
  de FS: Platsch! Sie ist im Pool.
  EN TP: splashing in a bathtub
  de TP: in der Badewanne planschen
  EN FP: splashing in a puddle
  de FP: in einer Pfütze planschen
938 | bed (noun): the piece of furniture you sleep on | loc: Bett
  EN TS: She is making the bed.
  de TS: Sie macht das Bett.
  EN FS: She is making a cake.
  de FS: Sie macht einen Kuchen.
  EN TP: to make the bed
  de TP: das Bett machen
  EN FP: to go to bed
  de FP: ins Bett gehen
939 | bedroom (noun): the room you sleep in | loc: Schlafzimmer
  EN TS: Pillow up! Bedroom party!
  de TS: Kissen hoch! Schlafzimmerparty!
  EN FS: Pillow up! Kitchen party!
  de FS: Kissen hoch! Küchenparty!
  EN TP: a bright messy bedroom
  de TP: ein helles, chaotisches Schlafzimmer
  EN FP: a bright messy kitchen
  de FP: eine helle, chaotische Küche
941 | bench (noun): a long seat for more than one person | loc: Bank
  EN TS: Pigeons attacked her bench!
  de TS: Tauben haben ihre Bank angegriffen!
  EN FS: Ducks attacked her bench!
  de FS: Enten haben ihre Bank angegriffen!
  EN TP: a woman on a bench
  de TP: eine Frau auf einer Bank
  EN FP: a bench at the station
  de FP: eine Bank am Bahnhof
942 | bicycle (noun): a vehicle with two wheels moved by pedals | loc: Fahrrad
  EN TS: He is riding a bicycle.
  de TS: Er fährt Fahrrad.
  EN FS: He is riding a scooter.
  de FS: Er fährt Roller.
  EN TP: a bicycle in autumn
  de TP: ein Fahrrad im Herbst
  EN FP: a bicycle in the snow
  de FP: ein Fahrrad im Schnee
943 | billboard (noun): a huge board above a street where ads are posted | loc: Werbetafel
  EN TS: He is papering a billboard.
  de TS: Er beklebt eine Werbetafel.
  EN FS: He is painting a billboard.
  de FS: Er bemalt eine Werbetafel.
  EN TP: a blank giant billboard
  de TP: eine leere, riesige Werbetafel
  EN FP: a billboard on a bus
  de FP: eine Werbetafel auf einem Bus
944 | binoculars (noun): double lenses for seeing far-away things | loc: Fernglas
  EN TS: He forgot to use his binoculars.
  de TS: Er hat vergessen, sein Fernglas zu benutzen.
  EN FS: He forgot to use his telescope.
  de FS: Er hat vergessen, sein Teleskop zu benutzen.
  EN TP: black binoculars at the chest
  de TP: ein schwarzes Fernglas vor der Brust
  EN FP: black binoculars on a table
  de FP: ein schwarzes Fernglas auf dem Tisch
947 | bleeding (noun): losing blood from a cut or wound | loc: blutend
  EN TS: His nose is bleeding.
  de TS: Seine Nase blutet.
  EN FS: His knee is bleeding.
  de FS: Sein Knie blutet.
  EN TP: a bleeding nose
  de TP: eine blutende Nase
  EN FP: a bleeding knee
  de FP: ein blutendes Knie
948 | blender (noun): the machine whose blades mix food into a drink | loc: Mixer
  EN TS: Berries in the blender? Yum!
  de TS: Beeren in den Mixer? Lecker!
  EN FS: Cherries in the blender? Yum!
  de FS: Kirschen in den Mixer? Lecker!
  EN TP: filling a blender
  de TP: einen Mixer befüllen
  EN FP: cleaning a blender
  de FP: einen Mixer sauber machen
949 | blister (noun): a small bubble of skin filled with liquid | loc: Blase
  EN TS: Ouch, a blister on the heel!
  de TS: Autsch, eine Blase an der Ferse!
  EN FS: Ouch, a blister on the toe!
  de FS: Autsch, eine Blase am Zeh!
  EN TP: a blister on the heel
  de TP: eine Blase an der Ferse
  EN FP: a blister on the hand
  de FP: eine Blase an der Hand
950 | blood (noun): the red liquid that flows through your body | loc: Blut
  EN TS: He is giving blood.
  de TS: Er spendet Blut.
  EN FS: He is giving a speech.
  de FS: Er hält eine Rede.
  EN TP: a bag of donated blood
  de TP: ein Beutel Spenderblut
  EN FP: blood on a white shirt
  de FP: Blut auf einem weißen Hemd
952 | boat (noun): a small vessel for travel on water | loc: Boot
  EN TS: He is rowing a wooden boat.
  de TS: Er rudert ein Boot aus Holz.
  EN FS: He is rowing a rubber boat.
  de FS: Er rudert ein Boot aus Gummi.
  EN TP: rowing a wooden boat
  de TP: ein Holzboot rudern
  EN FP: a boat in a harbour
  de FP: ein Boot im Hafen
953 | border (noun): the line where one country meets another | loc: Grenze
  EN TS: The border is open for the car.
  de TS: Die Grenze ist offen für das Auto.
  EN FS: The border is open for the bus.
  de FS: Die Grenze ist offen für den Bus.
  EN TP: a border checkpoint
  de TP: ein Kontrollpunkt an der Grenze
  EN FP: a border of flowers
  de FP: eine Einfassung aus Blumen
954 | boss (noun): a person who is in control of workers | loc: Chef
  EN TS: The boss is giving a talk.
  de TS: Der Chef hält einen Vortrag.
  EN FS: The boss is giving a gift.
  de FS: Der Chef überreicht ein Geschenk.
  EN TP: a boss at a meeting
  de TP: ein Chef im Meeting
  EN FP: a boss at a party
  de FP: ein Chef auf einer Party
956 | brain (noun): the organ in the head we think with | loc: Gehirn
  EN TS: She is studying a brain model.
  de TS: Sie untersucht ein Modell vom Gehirn.
  EN FS: She is studying a heart model.
  de FS: Sie untersucht ein Modell vom Herz.
  EN TP: a model of a brain
  de TP: ein Modell eines Gehirns
  EN FP: a picture of a brain
  de FP: ein Bild eines Gehirns
957 | branch (noun): a stem growing out from a plant's main stem | loc: Ast
  EN TS: A robin sits on the branch.
  de TS: Ein Rotkehlchen sitzt auf dem Ast.
  EN FS: An owl sits on the branch.
  de FS: Eine Eule sitzt auf dem Ast.
  EN TP: a swing on a branch
  de TP: eine Schaukel an einem Ast
  EN FP: a swing in the park
  de FP: eine Schaukel im Park
958 | bride (noun): the woman getting married that day | loc: Braut
  EN TS: The bride is ready!
  de TS: Die Braut ist bereit!
  EN FS: The groom is ready!
  de FS: Der Bräutigam ist bereit!
  EN TP: a bride with white roses
  de TP: eine Braut mit weißen Rosen
  EN FP: a bride with red roses
  de FP: eine Braut mit roten Rosen
959 | bridge (noun): a structure that lets people cross a river or road | loc: Brücke
  EN TS: She is walking under a bridge.
  de TS: Sie geht unter einer Brücke durch.
  EN FS: She is walking over a bridge.
  de FS: Sie geht über eine Brücke.
  EN TP: a huge suspension bridge
  de TP: eine riesige Hängebrücke
  EN FP: a small wooden bridge
  de FP: eine kleine Holzbrücke
960 | broom (noun): a brush with a long handle for sweeping floors | loc: Besen
  EN TS: She is sweeping with a broom.
  de TS: Sie fegt mit einem Besen.
  EN FS: She is sweeping with a rake.
  de FS: Sie fegt mit einem Rechen.
  EN TP: a straw broom
  de TP: ein Besen aus Stroh
  EN FP: a witch's broom
  de FP: ein Hexenbesen
961 | brother (noun): a boy or man with the same parents as you | loc: Bruder
  EN TS: Big brother wins again.
  de TS: Der große Bruder gewinnt schon wieder.
  EN FS: Big sister wins again.
  de FS: Die große Schwester gewinnt schon wieder.
  EN TP: a brother in a headlock
  de TP: ein Bruder im Schwitzkasten
  EN FP: boxing with a brother
  de FP: mit einem Bruder boxen
962 | bruise (noun): a dark purple mark left after a hit | loc: Bluterguss
  EN TS: Her knee has a big bruise.
  de TS: Ihr Knie hat einen großen Bluterguss.
  EN FS: Her arm has a big bruise.
  de FS: Ihr Arm hat einen großen Bluterguss.
  EN TP: a bruise on a knee
  de TP: ein Bluterguss am Knie
  EN FP: a bruise on an eye
  de FP: ein Bluterguss am Auge
963 | builder (noun): a person whose job is making houses and walls | loc: Bauarbeiter
  EN TS: The builder is making a wall.
  de TS: Der Bauarbeiter baut eine Mauer.
  EN FS: The builder is making a roof.
  de FS: Der Bauarbeiter baut ein Dach.
  EN TP: a builder with a trowel
  de TP: ein Bauarbeiter mit Kelle
  EN FP: a builder with a hammer
  de FP: ein Bauarbeiter mit Hammer
965 | trowel (noun): a flat hand tool for spreading cement or mortar | loc: Maurerkelle
  EN TS: The builder's trowel is full.
  de TS: Die Maurerkelle des Bauarbeiters ist voll.
  EN FS: The builder's bucket is full.
  de FS: Der Eimer des Bauarbeiters ist voll.
  EN TP: a trowel full of mortar
  de TP: eine Maurerkelle voller Mörtel
  EN FP: a trowel full of soil
  de FP: eine Maurerkelle voller Erde
967 | bus driver (noun): a person who takes passengers around a city route | loc: Busfahrer
  EN TS: This bus driver is too happy.
  de TS: Dieser Busfahrer ist zu gut gelaunt.
  EN FS: This taxi driver is too happy.
  de FS: Dieser Taxifahrer ist zu gut gelaunt.
  EN TP: a smiling bus driver
  de TP: ein lächelnder Busfahrer
  EN FP: a bus driver on strike
  de FP: ein streikender Busfahrer
970 | butcher (noun): a person who cuts and sells meat | loc: Metzger
  EN TS: The butcher is cutting beef.
  de TS: Der Metzger schneidet Rindfleisch.
  EN FS: The butcher is cutting bread.
  de FS: Der Metzger schneidet Brot.
  EN TP: a butcher slicing beef
  de TP: ein Metzger schneidet Rindfleisch
  EN FP: a butcher selling fish
  de FP: ein Metzger verkauft Fisch
973 | cactus (noun): a desert plant covered in sharp spines | loc: Kaktus
  EN TS: A bird landed on the cactus.
  de TS: Ein Vogel ist auf dem Kaktus gelandet.
  EN FS: A bee landed on the cactus.
  de FS: Eine Biene ist auf dem Kaktus gelandet.
  EN TP: a bird on a cactus
  de TP: ein Vogel auf einem Kaktus
  EN FP: a cactus in a pot
  de FP: ein Kaktus im Topf
974 | cafe (noun): a small restaurant selling drinks and snacks | loc: Café
  EN TS: It is a busy little cafe.
  de TS: Es ist ein volles kleines Café.
  EN FS: It is an empty little cafe.
  de FS: Es ist ein leeres kleines Café.
  EN TP: a cozy sunlit cafe
  de TP: ein gemütliches, sonniges Café
  EN FP: a closed cafe
  de FP: ein geschlossenes Café
977 | camera (noun): the equipment you use for taking photographs | loc: Kamera
  EN TS: She is aiming her camera.
  de TS: Sie richtet ihre Kamera aus.
  EN FS: She is aiming her phone.
  de FS: Sie richtet ihr Handy aus.
  EN TP: a vintage camera
  de TP: eine Vintage-Kamera
  EN FP: a security camera
  de FP: eine Überwachungskamera
980 | captain (noun): the person in command of a ship | loc: Kapitän
  EN TS: The captain is at the wheel.
  de TS: Der Kapitän steht am Steuer.
  EN FS: The captain is at the bar.
  de FS: Der Kapitän steht an der Bar.
  EN TP: a captain at the wheel
  de TP: ein Kapitän am Steuer
  EN FP: a football team captain
  de FP: ein Kapitän einer Fußballmannschaft
981 | car (noun): a motor vehicle with four wheels | loc: Auto
  EN TS: Green car, sea view, pure style.
  de TS: Grünes Auto, Meerblick, purer Stil.
  EN FS: Green car, city view, pure style.
  de FS: Grünes Auto, Stadtblick, purer Stil.
  EN TP: a green classic car
  de TP: ein grünes Oldtimer-Auto
  EN FP: a green family car
  de FP: ein grünes Familienauto
983 | cashier (noun): the person who takes payments at a shop | loc: Kassierer
  EN TS: The cashier is scanning a jar.
  de TS: Der Kassierer scannt ein Glas.
  EN FS: The cashier is scanning a can.
  de FS: Der Kassierer scannt eine Dose.
  EN TP: a cashier at the checkout
  de TP: ein Kassierer an der Kasse
  EN FP: a cashier in a bank
  de FP: ein Kassierer in der Bank
984 | cast (noun): a hard cover that holds a broken bone still | loc: Gipsverband
  EN TS: The plaster cast is still wet.
  de TS: Der Gipsverband ist noch nass.
  EN FS: The plaster cast is dry.
  de FS: Der Gipsverband ist schon trocken.
  EN TP: a fresh arm cast
  de TP: ein frischer Gipsverband am Arm
  EN FP: a fresh leg cast
  de FP: ein frischer Gipsverband am Bein
986 | caterpillar (noun): the young worm-like form of a butterfly | loc: Raupe
  EN TS: A caterpillar is eating lunch.
  de TS: Eine Raupe isst zu Mittag.
  EN FS: A snail is eating lunch.
  de FS: Eine Schnecke isst zu Mittag.
  EN TP: a caterpillar eating a leaf
  de TP: eine Raupe frisst ein Blatt
  EN FP: a caterpillar on a flower
  de FP: eine Raupe auf einer Blume
989 | check in (phrase): to register at a desk before a flight or stay | loc: einchecken | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is checking in her bag.
  de TS: Sie checkt ihre Tasche ein.
  EN FS: She is checking in her dog.
  de FS: Sie checkt ihren Hund ein.
  EN TP: checking in at the airport
  de TP: am Flughafen einchecken
  EN FP: checking in at a hotel
  de FP: im Hotel einchecken
990 | chef (noun): a professional cook | loc: Chefkoch
  EN TS: The chef is using tweezers.
  de TS: Der Chefkoch benutzt eine Pinzette.
  EN FS: The chef is using a spoon.
  de FS: Der Chefkoch benutzt einen Löffel.
  EN TP: a chef plating food
  de TP: ein Chefkoch richtet an
  EN FP: a chef tasting soup
  de FP: ein Chefkoch probiert Suppe
991 | chest (noun): the front upper part of the body | loc: Brust
  EN TS: His chest is bare.
  de TS: Seine Brust ist nackt.
  EN FS: His chest is covered.
  de FS: Seine Brust ist bedeckt.
  EN TP: a bare chest
  de TP: eine nackte Brust
  EN FP: a treasure chest
  de FP: eine Schatztruhe
995 | classmate (noun): a student in the same class at school as you | loc: Mitschüler
  EN TS: Her classmate knows a secret.
  de TS: Ihr Mitschüler kennt ein Geheimnis.
  EN FS: Her teacher knows a secret.
  de FS: Ihr Lehrer kennt ein Geheimnis.
  EN TP: whispering to a classmate
  de TP: einem Mitschüler etwas zuflüstern
  EN FP: a classmate at the board
  de FP: ein Mitschüler an der Tafel
996 | clay (noun): soft wet earth shaped and baked into pots | loc: Ton
  EN TS: Hands are shaping wet clay.
  de TS: Hände formen nassen Ton.
  EN FS: Hands are shaping wet sand.
  de FS: Hände formen nassen Sand.
  EN TP: shaping a clay pot
  de TP: einen Topf aus Ton formen
  EN FP: painting a clay pot
  de FP: einen Topf aus Ton bemalen
998 | clerk (noun): an office worker who handles papers and records | loc: Sachbearbeiter
  EN TS: Papers flying, clerk still stamping.
  de TS: Papiere fliegen, der Sachbearbeiter stempelt weiter.
  EN FS: Papers flying, clerk still sleeping.
  de FS: Papiere fliegen, der Sachbearbeiter schläft weiter.
  EN TP: a clerk stamping papers
  de TP: ein Sachbearbeiter stempelt Papiere
  EN FP: a hotel desk clerk
  de FP: ein Hotelrezeptionist
1000 | climate (noun): the usual weather of a region over many years | loc: Klima
  EN TS: The climate is getting warmer.
  de TS: Das Klima wird wärmer.
  EN FS: The climate is getting colder.
  de FS: Das Klima wird kälter.
  EN TP: a changing mountain climate
  de TP: ein sich wandelndes Bergklima
  EN FP: a tropical island climate
  de FP: ein tropisches Inselklima
1001 | clinic (noun): a small medical center you visit without staying | loc: Klinik
  EN TS: The clinic is ready for you.
  de TS: Die Klinik ist bereit für dich.
  EN FS: The school is ready for you.
  de FS: Die Schule ist bereit für dich.
  EN TP: a bright clinic waiting room
  de TP: ein helles Wartezimmer der Klinik
  EN FP: a clinic for dogs
  de FP: eine Klinik für Hunde
1003 | cloud (noun): a white or grey mass of water drops up in the sky | loc: Wolke
  EN TS: Just one cloud today.
  de TS: Heute nur eine Wolke.
  EN FS: Just two clouds today.
  de FS: Heute nur zwei Wolken.
  EN TP: one big white cloud
  de TP: eine große weiße Wolke
  EN FP: a grey rain cloud
  de FP: eine graue Regenwolke
1004 | coach (noun): someone in charge of training an athlete or team | loc: Trainer
  EN TS: The coach is not whispering.
  de TS: Der Trainer flüstert nicht gerade.
  EN FS: The coach is not shouting.
  de FS: Der Trainer schreit nicht gerade.
  EN TP: a coach with a whistle
  de TP: ein Trainer mit Pfeife
  EN FP: a coach full of tourists
  de FP: ein Reisebus voller Touristen
1006 | coffee maker (noun): a kitchen machine for brewing hot drinks | loc: Kaffeemaschine
  EN TS: The coffee maker is too slow.
  de TS: Die Kaffeemaschine ist viel zu langsam.
  EN FS: The toaster is too slow.
  de FS: Der Toaster ist viel zu langsam.
  EN TP: a dripping coffee maker
  de TP: eine tropfende Kaffeemaschine
  EN FP: a new coffee maker
  de FP: eine neue Kaffeemaschine
1007 | colleague (noun): a person you work with at your job | loc: Kollege
  EN TS: Two colleagues are talking.
  de TS: Zwei Kollegen unterhalten sich.
  EN FS: Two colleagues are eating.
  de FS: Zwei Kollegen essen zusammen.
  EN TP: colleagues at a whiteboard
  de TP: Kollegen am Whiteboard
  EN FP: colleagues at a party
  de FP: Kollegen auf einer Party
1008 | community (noun): people from one area who do things together | loc: Gemeinschaft
  EN TS: The community is planting.
  de TS: Die Gemeinschaft pflanzt zusammen.
  EN FS: The community is painting.
  de FS: Die Gemeinschaft streicht zusammen.
  EN TP: a community garden
  de TP: ein Gemeinschaftsgarten
  EN FP: a gaming community
  de FP: eine Gaming-Community
1010 | contact (noun): someone you know who can help you at work | loc: Kontakt
  EN TS: She made a useful contact.
  de TS: Sie hat einen nützlichen Kontakt geknüpft.
  EN FS: She made a useful phone call.
  de FS: Sie hat einen nützlichen Anruf gemacht.
  EN TP: a new business contact
  de TP: ein neuer Geschäftskontakt
  EN FP: a contact in her phone
  de FP: ein Kontakt in ihrem Handy
1011 | cook (noun): someone who cooks food | loc: Koch
  EN TS: This cook needs two spoons!
  de TS: Dieser Koch braucht zwei Löffel!
  EN FS: This cook needs two pots!
  de FS: Dieser Koch braucht zwei Töpfe!
  EN TP: a cook tasting the food
  de TP: ein Koch probiert das Essen
  EN FP: a cook reading a recipe
  de FP: ein Koch liest ein Rezept
1012 | cough (verb): to push air out of your throat with a loud noise | loc: husten
  EN TS: She is coughing so hard!
  de TS: Sie hustet so heftig!
  EN FS: She is laughing so hard!
  de FS: Sie lacht so heftig!
  EN TP: coughing into the elbow
  de TP: in die Armbeuge husten
  EN FP: coughing into a tissue
  de FP: in ein Taschentuch husten
1013 | cousin (noun): the child of your aunt or uncle | loc: Cousin
  EN TS: Two cousins are laughing hard.
  de TS: Zwei Cousins lachen sich kaputt.
  EN FS: Two cousins are crying hard.
  de FS: Zwei Cousins heulen sich die Augen aus.
  EN TP: two cousins on the grass
  de TP: zwei Cousins im Gras
  EN FP: two cousins at a table
  de FP: zwei Cousins am Tisch
1015 | calf (noun): the thick muscle at the back of your lower leg | loc: Wade
  EN TS: He is holding his calf.
  de TS: Er hält sich die Wade.
  EN FS: He is holding his head.
  de FS: Er hält sich den Kopf.
  EN TP: holding his calf
  de TP: sich die Wade halten
  EN FP: feeding a calf
  de FP: ein Kalb füttern
1017 | crosswalk (noun): the striped part of a road for crossing | loc: Zebrastreifen
  EN TS: A woman is on the crosswalk.
  de TS: Eine Frau ist auf dem Zebrastreifen.
  EN FS: A dog is on the crosswalk.
  de FS: Ein Hund ist auf dem Zebrastreifen.
  EN TP: crossing at a crosswalk
  de TP: über den Zebrastreifen gehen
  EN FP: a crosswalk in the rain
  de FP: ein Zebrastreifen im Regen
1022 | cushion (noun): a soft pillow-like pad you sit or lean on | loc: Kissen
  EN TS: This cushion lost the fight.
  de TS: Dieses Kissen hat den Kampf verloren.
  EN FS: This sofa lost the fight.
  de FS: Dieses Sofa hat den Kampf verloren.
  EN TP: to fluff a cushion
  de TP: ein Kissen aufschütteln
  EN FP: to sit on a cushion
  de FP: auf einem Kissen sitzen
1025 | cyclist (noun): a person who rides a bicycle | loc: Radfahrer
  EN TS: That cyclist is super brave.
  de TS: Der Radfahrer ist mega mutig.
  EN FS: That runner is super brave.
  de FS: Der Läufer ist mega mutig.
  EN TP: a cyclist cornering fast
  de TP: ein Radfahrer in schneller Kurve
  EN FP: a cyclist in the city
  de FP: ein Radfahrer in der Stadt
1026 | czech (adjective): from the country with Prague as its capital | loc: tschechisch
  EN TS: Czech beer? Yes, please!
  de TS: Tschechisches Bier? Ja, bitte!
  EN FS: Czech wine? Yes, please!
  de FS: Tschechischer Wein? Ja, bitte!
  EN TP: a Czech beer hall
  de TP: eine tschechische Bierhalle
  EN FP: a Czech wine cellar
  de FP: ein tschechischer Weinkeller
1028 | czech republic (noun): a small country in central Europe, capital Prague | loc: Tschechien
  EN TS: She is in the Czech Republic.
  de TS: Sie ist in Tschechien.
  EN FS: He is in the Czech Republic.
  de FS: Er ist in Tschechien.
  EN TP: sunset in the Czech Republic
  de TP: Sonnenuntergang in Tschechien
  EN FP: snow in the Czech Republic
  de FP: Schnee in Tschechien
1030 | daughter (noun): a female child | loc: Tochter
  EN TS: Flowers from his daughter!
  de TS: Blumen von seiner Tochter!
  EN FS: Flowers from his son!
  de FS: Blumen von seinem Sohn!
  EN TP: flowers from a daughter
  de TP: Blumen von einer Tochter
  EN FP: flowers for a daughter
  de FP: Blumen für eine Tochter
1033 | desert (noun): a huge dry area of sand where little grows | loc: Wüste
  EN TS: The desert has no end!
  de TS: Die Wüste hat kein Ende!
  EN FS: The forest has no end!
  de FS: Der Wald hat kein Ende!
  EN TP: camels in the desert
  de TP: Kamele in der Wüste
  EN FP: snow in the desert
  de FP: Schnee in der Wüste
1035 | destination (noun): the place you are travelling to | loc: Reiseziel
  EN TS: He can't see his destination.
  de TS: Er kann sein Reiseziel nicht sehen.
  EN FS: He can't see the traffic.
  de FS: Er kann den Verkehr nicht sehen.
  EN TP: far from the destination
  de TP: weit weg vom Reiseziel
  EN FP: arriving at the destination
  de FP: am Reiseziel ankommen
1037 | detergent (noun): a liquid or powder used for washing up | loc: Reinigungsmittel
  EN TS: Extra detergent, extra foam.
  de TS: Extra Reinigungsmittel, extra Schaum.
  EN FS: Extra detergent, no foam.
  de FS: Extra Reinigungsmittel, null Schaum.
  EN TP: pouring washing-up detergent
  de TP: Reinigungsmittel ins Spülwasser
  EN FP: detergent for the laundry
  de FP: Reinigungsmittel für die Wäsche
1040 | divorced (adjective): no longer married to your husband or wife | loc: geschieden
  EN TS: Soon they will be divorced.
  de TS: Bald sind sie geschieden.
  EN FS: Soon they will be married.
  de FS: Bald sind sie verheiratet.
  EN TP: getting divorced
  de TP: frisch geschieden
  EN FP: getting married
  de FP: frisch verheiratet
1041 | dizziness (noun): the sick feeling that everything is spinning | loc: Schwindel
  EN TS: Dizziness hits her hard.
  de TS: Der Schwindel trifft sie hart.
  EN FS: Dizziness hits him hard.
  de FS: Der Schwindel trifft ihn hart.
  EN TP: a wave of dizziness
  de TP: ein Anfall von Schwindel
  EN FP: dizziness on a boat
  de FP: Schwindel auf einem Boot
1043 | arc (noun): a curved line or path shaped like part of a circle | loc: Bogen
  EN TS: The dolphin's arc gets ten points!
  de TS: Der Bogen des Delfins kriegt zehn Punkte!
  EN FS: The seal's arc gets ten points!
  de FS: Der Bogen der Robbe kriegt zehn Punkte!
  EN TP: a dolphin's leaping arc
  de TP: der Sprungbogen eines Delfins
  EN FP: an arc of a rainbow
  de FP: der Bogen eines Regenbogens
1048 | dumbbell (noun): a short bar with a weight at each end | loc: Hantel
  EN TS: That dumbbell is super heavy.
  de TS: Die Hantel ist mega schwer.
  EN FS: That dumbbell is super light.
  de FS: Die Hantel ist mega leicht.
  EN TP: curling a heavy dumbbell
  de TP: eine schwere Hantel curlen
  EN FP: a dumbbell on the floor
  de FP: eine Hantel auf dem Boden
1050 | dutch (adjective): from or connected with the Netherlands | loc: niederländisch
  EN TS: Tulips on a bike? So Dutch!
  de TS: Tulpen auf dem Fahrrad? So niederländisch!
  EN FS: Cheese on a bike? So Dutch!
  de FS: Käse auf dem Fahrrad? So niederländisch!
  EN TP: tall Dutch houses
  de TP: hohe niederländische Häuser
  EN FP: a Dutch cheese market
  de FP: ein niederländischer Käsemarkt
1057 | employer (noun): a person or company that pays people to work | loc: Arbeitgeber
  EN TS: The employer is shaking hands.
  de TS: Der Arbeitgeber schüttelt Hände.
  EN FS: The employer is washing hands.
  de FS: Der Arbeitgeber wäscht sich die Hände.
  EN TP: a welcoming employer
  de TP: ein freundlicher Arbeitgeber
  EN FP: an angry employer
  de FP: ein wütender Arbeitgeber
1064 | everybody (noun): all people, each person in a group | loc: alle
  EN TS: Everybody is cheering!
  de TS: Alle jubeln!
  EN FS: Everybody is sleeping!
  de FS: Alle schlafen!
  EN TP: everybody raising their arms
  de TP: alle reißen die Arme hoch
  EN FP: everybody sitting down
  de FP: alle setzen sich hin
1067 | expert (noun): a person with special knowledge or skill | loc: Experte
  EN TS: He is a real watch expert.
  de TS: Er ist ein echter Uhrenexperte.
  EN FS: He is a real wine expert.
  de FS: Er ist ein echter Weinexperte.
  EN TP: a watch expert
  de TP: ein Uhrenexperte
  EN FP: an expert on TV
  de FP: ein Experte im Fernsehen
1069 | eye (noun): the organ of sight | loc: Auge
  EN TS: This eye is green-brown.
  de TS: Dieses Auge ist grünbraun.
  EN FS: This eye is bright blue.
  de FS: Dieses Auge ist knallblau.
  EN TP: an open eye
  de TP: ein offenes Auge
  EN FP: a closed eye
  de FP: ein geschlossenes Auge
1070 | face (noun): the front of the head, from forehead to chin | loc: Gesicht
  EN TS: She has a laughing face.
  de TS: Sie hat ein lachendes Gesicht.
  EN FS: She has a crying face.
  de FS: Sie hat ein weinendes Gesicht.
  EN TP: a laughing face
  de TP: ein lachendes Gesicht
  EN FP: a sleeping face
  de FP: ein schlafendes Gesicht
1071 | farmer (noun): a person who operates a farm | loc: Bauer
  EN TS: The farmer is working late.
  de TS: Der Bauer arbeitet bis spät.
  EN FS: The farmer is sleeping late.
  de FS: Der Bauer schläft bis spät.
  EN TP: a farmer with a fork
  de TP: ein Bauer mit Heugabel
  EN FP: a farmer with a cow
  de FP: ein Bauer mit Kuh
1072 | fellow (noun): a man; a friendly informal word for a guy | loc: Kerl
  EN TS: These two fellows are so happy.
  de TS: Die zwei Kerle sind so glücklich.
  EN FS: These two fellows are so angry.
  de FS: Die zwei Kerle sind so wütend.
  EN TP: two fellows shaking hands
  de TP: zwei Kerle geben sich die Hand
  EN FP: a fellow student waving
  de FP: ein Kerl winkt
1073 | female (adjective): being a woman or a girl | loc: weiblich
  EN TS: The female climber is flying!
  de TS: Die weibliche Kletterin fliegt!
  EN FS: The male climber is flying!
  de FS: Der männliche Kletterer fliegt!
  EN TP: a female climber
  de TP: eine weibliche Kletterin
  EN FP: a female runner
  de FP: eine weibliche Läuferin
1074 | fever (noun): a high body temperature when you are ill | loc: Fieber
  EN TS: He is checking her fever.
  de TS: Er kontrolliert ihr Fieber.
  EN FS: He is checking her phone.
  de FS: Er kontrolliert ihr Handy.
  EN TP: checking her fever
  de TP: ihr Fieber messen
  EN FP: checking her pulse
  de FP: ihren Puls messen
1076 | finger (noun): any of the long parts on your hand, not the thumb | loc: Finger
  EN TS: A finger is touching a drop.
  de TS: Ein Finger berührt einen Tropfen.
  EN FS: A finger is touching a bee.
  de FS: Ein Finger berührt eine Biene.
  EN TP: a finger touching a drop
  de TP: ein Finger berührt einen Tropfen
  EN FP: a finger near a bee
  de FP: ein Finger neben einer Biene
1078 | firefighter (noun): a person whose job is putting out fires | loc: Feuerwehrmann
  EN TS: The firefighter is on duty.
  de TS: Der Feuerwehrmann ist im Einsatz.
  EN FS: The firefighter is on holiday.
  de FS: Der Feuerwehrmann ist im Urlaub.
  EN TP: a firefighter with a hose
  de TP: ein Feuerwehrmann mit Schlauch
  EN FP: a firefighter with a cat
  de FP: ein Feuerwehrmann mit Katze
1079 | first aid (noun): quick help given to someone hurt or ill | loc: Erste Hilfe
  EN TS: He is giving first aid.
  de TS: Er leistet Erste Hilfe.
  EN FS: He is giving directions.
  de FS: Er gibt eine Wegbeschreibung.
  EN TP: an open first aid kit
  de TP: ein offener Erste-Hilfe-Kasten
  EN FP: a first aid course
  de FP: ein Erste-Hilfe-Kurs
1082 | fisherman (noun): a person who catches fish as a job | loc: Fischer
  EN TS: The fisherman caught a lot!
  de TS: Der Fischer hat richtig viel gefangen!
  EN FS: The fisherman caught nothing!
  de FS: Der Fischer hat gar nichts gefangen!
  EN TP: a fisherman with a net
  de TP: ein Fischer mit Netz
  EN FP: a fisherman with a rod
  de FP: ein Fischer mit Angel
1084 | flight (noun): a journey traveling by air in a plane | loc: Flug
  EN TS: The flight is just starting.
  de TS: Der Flug startet gerade.
  EN FS: The flight is just landing.
  de FS: Der Flug landet gerade.
  EN TP: a flight after takeoff
  de TP: ein Flug nach dem Start
  EN FP: a flight of stairs
  de FP: eine Treppe
1085 | floor (noun): the flat inside surface of a room you walk on | loc: Boden
  EN TS: She is mopping a wooden floor.
  de TS: Sie wischt einen Holzboden.
  EN FS: She is mopping a stone floor.
  de FS: Sie wischt einen Steinboden.
  EN TP: a wide wooden floor
  de TP: ein breiter Holzboden
  EN FP: the first floor
  de FP: der erste Stock
1088 | foot (noun): the part of the leg below the ankle | loc: Fuß
  EN TS: A bare foot is in the grass.
  de TS: Ein nackter Fuß steht im Gras.
  EN FS: A bare foot is in the snow.
  de FS: Ein nackter Fuß steht im Schnee.
  EN TP: a bare foot in grass
  de TP: ein nackter Fuß im Gras
  EN FP: a foot in a sock
  de FP: ein Fuß in einer Socke
1093 | fracture (noun): a break or crack in a bone | loc: Knochenbruch
  EN TS: There is a fracture in the leg.
  de TS: Im Bein ist ein Knochenbruch.
  EN FS: There is a fracture in the arm.
  de FS: Im Arm ist ein Knochenbruch.
  EN TP: a leg bone fracture
  de TP: ein Knochenbruch im Bein
  EN FP: a wrist bone fracture
  de FP: ein Knochenbruch am Handgelenk
1096 | gallery (noun): a room where art is shown to the public | loc: Galerie
  EN TS: She is in a white gallery.
  de TS: Sie ist in einer weißen Galerie.
  EN FS: She is in a white kitchen.
  de FS: Sie ist in einer weißen Küche.
  EN TP: walking through a gallery
  de TP: durch eine Galerie gehen
  EN FP: walking through a shop
  de FP: durch einen Laden gehen
1097 | garage (noun): a building where a car is kept | loc: Garage
  EN TS: She is closing the garage.
  de TS: Sie schließt die Garage.
  EN FS: She is closing the window.
  de FS: Sie schließt das Fenster.
  EN TP: closing the garage door
  de TP: das Garagentor schließen
  EN FP: opening the garage door
  de FP: das Garagentor öffnen
1100 | gardener (noun): a person who looks after a garden | loc: Gärtner
  EN TS: The gardener is cutting roses.
  de TS: Der Gärtner schneidet Rosen.
  EN FS: The gardener is cutting grass.
  de FS: Der Gärtner schneidet Gras.
  EN TP: a gardener with roses
  de TP: ein Gärtner mit Rosen
  EN FP: a gardener with a mower
  de FP: ein Gärtner mit Rasenmäher
1104 | gentleman (noun): a polite, well-mannered man | loc: Gentleman
  EN TS: What a gentleman!
  de TS: Was für ein Gentleman!
  EN FS: What a lady!
  de FS: Was für eine Lady!
  EN TP: a gentleman tipping his hat
  de TP: ein Gentleman lüftet den Hut
  EN FP: a gentleman closing the door
  de FP: ein Gentleman schließt die Tür
1107 | girlfriend (noun): a young woman you are dating | loc: Freundin
  EN TS: He is hugging his girlfriend.
  de TS: Er umarmt seine Freundin.
  EN FS: He is carrying his girlfriend.
  de FS: Er trägt seine Freundin.
  EN TP: hugging his girlfriend
  de TP: seine Freundin umarmen
  EN FP: a girlfriend on the phone
  de FP: eine Freundin am Telefon
